Wyoming, session 2026, SF0001.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. As used in this act:
(a) "Agency" means any governmental unit or branch of government
receiving an appropriation under this act;
(b) "Appropriation" means the authorizations granted by the
legislature under this act to make expenditures from and to incur obligations
against the general and other funds as specified;
(c) "Approved budget" means as defined by W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(xxiii);
(d) "A4" means an agency trust account;
(e) "EF" means the agency's account within the enterprise fund;
(f) "FF" means federal funds;
(g) "IS" means the agency's account within the internal service fund;
(h) "PF" means the retirement account created by W.S. 9-3-407(a);
(j) "PR" means private funding sources;
(k) "P2" means the deferred compensation account referenced in W.S.
9-3-507;
1 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(m) "SR" means an agency's account within the special revenue fund;
(n) "S1" means water development account I created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(i);
(o) "S2" means water development account II created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(ii);
(p) "S4" means the local government capital construction account
funded by W.S. 9-4-601(a)(vi) and (b)(i)(A) and 39-14-801(e)(ix);
(q) "S5" means the "school foundation program account" or "public
school foundation program account" created by W.S. 21-13-306(a);
(r) "S7" means the highway fund;
(s) "S10" means the legislative stabilization reserve account;
(t) "S13" means the strategic investments and projects account;
(u) "S14" means the Wyoming tourism account;
(w) "S0" means other funds identified by footnote;
(y) "T2" means the miners' hospital permanent land income fund;
(z) "T3" means the state hospital account within the permanent land
fund;
(aa) "T4" means the poor farm account within the permanent land fund
as established by W.S. 9-4-310(a)(v);
(bb) "T0" means other expendable trust funds administered by an agency
for specific functions within the agency's authority;
(cc) "TT" means the tobacco settlement trust income account;
(dd) "This appropriation," when used in a footnote, shall be construed
as a reference to that portion of the appropriated funds identified in the
footnote.
Section 2. The sums of money, or so much thereof as is necessary,
appropriated in this act are to be expended during the two (2) years
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028, or as otherwise specified,
2 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
for the purposes, programs and number of employees specified in this act and
the approved budget of each agency. Unless otherwise specifically provided,
the conditions, terms and other requirements on appropriations in this act
are effective until June 30, 2028, subject to accrual accounting principles.
3 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 001. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
PROGRAM
Administration 1., 2. 9,112,786 9,112,786
Tribal Liaison 430,121 430,121
Commission on Uniform Laws 94,903 94,903
Special Contingency 1,000,000 1,000,000
Homeland Security 6,007,818 22,895,512 867,990 SR 29,771,320
Natural Resource Policy 3. 1,000,000 850,000 SR 1,850,000
Endangered Species Admin. 675,000 675,000
Baseline Scientific Assess. 307,150 307,150
Asia Pacific Trade 4. 400,000 400,000
TOTALS 19,027,778 22,895,512 1,717,990 43,641,280
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 42
Part Time 2
TOTAL 44
1. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000.00) shall only be available for expenditure if there is a change of
governor as a result of the 2026 general election. This appropriation is for
transition staff salaries, travel, expenses incurred in relocating to and
from the governor's mansion and other related office expenses, except that up
to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) of this appropriation may be expended
for purposes of defraying moving expenses for gubernatorial appointees who
are required to move to Cheyenne and, of this twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00), not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) shall be
expended for any one (1) appointee. It is the intent of the legislature that
this appropriation not be included within the office of the governor's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
2. (a) Authorization for up to two (2) at-will employee contract positions
supported by funds originating from section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan
Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, shall remain effective until the latter of:
(i) December 31, 2026;
4 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
(ii) The date of completion of any federally required reporting
and audits; or
(iii) The date of any extension of federal expenditure deadlines
under section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2,
enacted into law.
3. (a) This general fund appropriation shall be deposited into the federal
natural resource policy account. All funds within the federal natural
resource policy account are appropriated and available for expenditure by the
governor in accordance with W.S. 9-4-218, including expenditure by the
governor for litigation costs incurred by Wyoming counties involved in
litigation related to any of the following:
(i) Federal land, water, air, mineral and other natural resource
policies that may affect the state or counties pursuant to W.S.
9-4-218(a)(iii);
(ii) Treaties between the United States and a federally
recognized Indian tribe.
4. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be
included in the office of the governor's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation is effective immediately.
Section 002. SECRETARY OF STATE
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 9,042,792 290,809 9,333,601
Securities Enforcement 721,822 SR 721,822
Bucking Horse & Rider 50,000 SR 50,000
TOTALS 9,042,792 290,809 771,822 10,105,423
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 33
Part Time 0
TOTAL 33
1. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($125,000.00) is appropriated for the costs of publication required
by W.S. 22-24-318 for any ballot proposition for an initiative appearing on
the 2026 statewide election ballot. It is the intent of the legislature that
5 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
this appropriation not be included in the secretary of state's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert
as provided by law to the general fund on December 31, 2026.
Section 003. STATE AUDITOR
PROGRAM
Administration 14,809,975 14,809,975
TOTALS 14,809,975 0 0 14,809,975
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 23
Part Time 0
TOTAL 23
Section 004. STATE TREASURER
PROGRAM
Treasurer's Operations 3,356,610 142,945 SR 3,499,555
Veterans' Tax Exemption 11,545,839 11,545,839
WyoSTAR 1,524,971 SR 1,524,971
Unclaimed Property 2,419,549 SR 2,419,549
Investments 1., 2. 49,735,616 SR 49,735,616
Native American Exemption 3. 918,975 918,975
TOTALS 15,821,424 0 53,823,081 69,644,505
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 51
Part Time 0
TOTAL 51
1. (a) The state treasurer's office, with the recommendation of the
investment funds committee and approval of the human resources division of
the department of administration and information, may:
(i) Approve reclassifications from investment analyst to senior
investment analyst and senior investment analyst to investment officer;
(ii) Adjust compensation within the classifications specified in
paragraph (i) of this footnote based on an assessment of an employee's
6 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
education, certification, demonstrated performance and potential for
increased responsibility.
(b) Nothing in this footnote should be construed to modify the maximum
annual salary limits provided in W.S. 9-1-409(j).
2. A portion of this other funds appropriation may be expended to conduct
the purposes of this footnote. In accordance with W.S. 9-1-205(a), the state
treasurer's office shall annually provide a public accounting of the direct,
indirect and total investment fees for all external investment managers in
both absolute dollars and as a percentage of state investments under
management.
3. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred twenty-eight thousand six
hundred fifty-two dollars ($128,652.00) is effective immediately.
Section 006. ADMINISTRATION AND INFORMATION
PROGRAM
Director's Office 4,713,078 217,939 SR 4,931,017
Professional Licensing Bds. 2,155,448 SR 2,155,448
General Services 1., 2. 74,874,129 21,998,877 IS
2,800,220 SR 99,673,226
Human Resources Division 23,132,836 23,132,836
Employees' Group Insurance 934,137,370 IS
8,000,000 SR 942,137,370
Economic Analysis 1,300,886 1,300,886
State Library 4,748,853 2,614,616 4,067,901 SR 11,431,370
TOTALS 108,769,782 2,614,616 973,377,755 1,084,762,153
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 293
Part Time 1
TOTAL 294
1. Of this general fund appropriation, one million twelve thousand two
hundred thirty-three dollars ($1,012,233.00) shall be reduced by one dollar
($1.00) for each one dollar ($1.00) distributed to the trades management unit
(unit 3055) to provide compensation adjustments up to, but not to exceed, the
2024 market pay tables under Section 329 of this act. Any unexpended,
unobligated funds from this appropriation shall revert to the general fund
not later than September 30, 2026.
7 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
2. (a) Of this general fund appropriation:
(i) Three hundred thirty-seven thousand one hundred thirty-three
dollars ($337,133.00) is appropriated to provide for the salary and benefits
of three (3) full-time equivalent positions for facility management for the
Riverton state office building for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and
ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended
for any other purpose; and
(ii) Eighty-seven thousand four hundred forty-six dollars
($87,446.00) is appropriated to pay for utilities at the Riverton state
office building for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30,
2028. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose.
Section 007. WYOMING MILITARY DEPARTMENT
PROGRAM
Military Dept. Operations 12,275,101 12,275,101
Air National Guard 1. 914,768 15,084,396 15,999,164
Camp Guernsey 1,317,755 SR 1,317,755
Army National Guard 2. 62,866 42,442,215 42,505,081
Veterans' Services 4,236,762 1,292,387 8,945 SR 5,538,094
Oregon Trail Cemetery 873,017 23,857 SR 896,874
Military Support 78,640 78,640
Civil Air Patrol 99,600 99,600
TOTALS 18,540,754 58,818,998 1,350,557 78,710,309
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 196
Part Time 29
TOTAL 225
1. Pursuant to W.S. 19-7-103(b)(xxii), authority is granted to the military
department to hire up to nine (9) full-time positions or at-will employee
contract positions within this division only when federal funds are received
that reimburse the state for one hundred percent (100%) of the costs of each
filled position. In the event federal funding becomes unavailable to
maintain one hundred percent (100%) reimbursement for a position filled
pursuant to this footnote, as determined by the United States property and
fiscal officer for Wyoming, the position shall be eliminated. The military
8 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
department shall notify the joint appropriations committee on all positions
created or eliminated pursuant to this footnote through the B-11 process as
authorized by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1013(b).
2. Pursuant to W.S. 19-7-103(b)(xxii), authority is granted to the military
department to hire up to thirteen (13) full-time positions or at-will
employee contract positions within this division only when federal funds are
received that reimburse the state for one hundred percent (100%) of the costs
of each filled position. In the event federal funding becomes unavailable to
maintain one hundred percent (100%) reimbursement for a position filled
pursuant to this footnote, as determined by the United States property and
fiscal officer for Wyoming, the position shall be eliminated. The military
department shall notify the joint appropriations committee on all positions
created or eliminated pursuant to this footnote through the B-11 process as
authorized by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1013(b).
Section 008. OFFICE OF THE PUBLIC DEFENDER
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 26,210,752 4,618,306 SR 30,829,058
TOTALS 26,210,752 0 4,618,306 30,829,058
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 78
Part Time 14
TOTAL 92
1. Of this general fund appropriation, twenty-six million two hundred ten
thousand seven hundred fifty-two dollars ($26,210,752.00) and of this other
funds appropriation, four million six hundred eighteen thousand three hundred
six dollars ($4,618,306.00)SR may be expended for contract trial attorneys,
contract legal support or compensation of full-time and part-time employee
positions authorized for the office of the public defender to address
caseload work requirements and geographic distribution of workload demands
across judicial districts in the most effective and efficient manner as
determined by the state public defender. This appropriation shall not be
subject to Section 307 of this act.
9 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 010. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
PROGRAM
Administration Div. 2,307,803 5,260 SR 2,313,063
Ag. Education and Info. 16,000 21,038 SR 37,038
Consumer Prot. Div. 4. 12,725,303 1,402,937 1,772,971 SR 15,901,211
Natural Resources Div. 1. 4,151,760 8,306 690,051 S1
258,000 S5 5,108,117
Pesticide Registration 773,671 773,671
State Fair 2,724,287 1,697,188 SR 4,421,475
Weed & Pest Control 4. 1,048,558 SR 1,048,558
Predator Management 2., 3. 10,012,400 1,000,000 SR 11,012,400
Wyoming Beef Council 4. 2,517,929 SR 2,517,929
Wyo Wheat Mktg. Comm. 4. 188,095 SR 188,095
Dry Bean Commission 4. 316,302 SR 316,302
Leaf Cutter Bee 4. 11,779 SR 11,779
TOTALS 32,711,224 1,411,243 9,527,171 43,649,638
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 74
Part Time 6
TOTAL 80
1. Of this general fund appropriation, three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000.00) is appropriated for Wyoming agriculture in the classroom. It
is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation be included in the
department of agriculture's standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)
is appropriated for expenditure in accordance with chapter 2 of the Wyoming
animal damage management board rules and for gray wolf depredation
compensation. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose.
3. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, one million six hundred thousand
dollars ($1,600,000.00) is appropriated for:
(i) Special projects prioritized for preventing listing of a
species as endangered under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973, 16
U.S.C. § 1531 et seq., as amended;
10 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
(ii) Projects that directly involve predator control that will
have the greatest benefit to wildlife or reduce the cost to the department
for animal damage payments.
(b) Of this other funds appropriation, one million dollars
($1,000,000.00)SR is appropriated from the game and fish fund. This other
funds appropriation to the department of agriculture shall only be effective
upon a majority vote of the game and fish commission and, if approved, shall
be expended consistent with the priorities specified in subsection (a) of
this footnote.
(c) The appropriations specified in this footnote shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the period beginning on
the effective date of this footnote and ending June 30, 2028, no funds shall
be expended from the animal damage management program (unit 0317), weed and
pest control division, Wyoming beef council division, Wyoming wheat marketing
commission division, dry bean commission division or leaf cutter bee division
for the purposes of cost allocation (300 series).
Section 011. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
PROGRAM
Administration 6,767,770 6,767,770
Revenue Division 10,326,157 975,760 SR 11,301,917
Valuation Division 1. 20,661,261 20,661,261
Liquor Division 2. 12,492,176 EF 12,492,176
TOTALS 37,755,188 0 13,467,936 51,223,124
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 124
Part Time 0
TOTAL 124
1. Of this general fund appropriation, twelve million dollars
($12,000,000.00) is appropriated for the property tax refund program pursuant
to W.S. 39-13-109(c)(v) for refunds to qualified applicants during the period
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending December 31, 2026.
11 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
2. Pursuant to W.S. 9-4-205(d) and 12-2-302(b), expenditures necessary to
defray the administrative expenses of the liquor division, including
salaries, office expenses and general expenses for the enforcement of the
duties of the division as well as sufficient funds to defray the cost of
alcoholic liquor purchases and attendant expenses are authorized by the
legislature for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028.
Section 014. MINERS' HOSPITAL BOARD
PROGRAM
Miners' Hospital Board 9,807,466 T2 9,807,466
TOTALS 0 0 9,807,466 9,807,466
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 3
Part Time 0
TOTAL 3
Section 015. ATTORNEY GENERAL
PROGRAM
Law Office 1., 4. 28,142,505 682,899 2,494,578 S5
5,432,005 SR
734,314 TT 37,486,301
Criminal Investigations 2., 3. 33,610,667 9,446,924 1,223,937 SR 44,281,528
Law Enforcement Academy 5,451,049 1,436,759 EF
11,908 IS 6,899,716
Peace Off. Stds. & Trng. 434,716 166,750 SR 601,466
Victim Services Division 9,126,755 13,462,214 5,781,471 SR 28,370,440
Governor's Council on DD 437,447 1,022,650 18,338 SR 1,478,435
TOTALS 77,203,139 24,614,687 17,300,060 119,117,886
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 235
Part Time 1
TOTAL 236
1. Of this general fund appropriation, forty-three thousand dollars
($43,000.00) is appropriated for employer-funded Wyoming state bar dues for
attorneys employed within any division of the office of the attorney general.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose.
12 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
2. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred sixty-seven thousand
three hundred thirty-five dollars ($167,335.00) is effective immediately.
3. Of this general fund appropriation, one million six hundred thousand
dollars ($1,600,000.00) is appropriated for the internet crimes against
children team (unit 0329). This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose. This appropriation shall not be effective if
2026 Senate File 0085 is enacted into law.
4. Of this general fund appropriation, five million dollars ($5,000,000.00)
is appropriated for avoiding, preparing for or participating in water
litigation within the law office unit (unit 0101) and shall be expended only
for the purpose of resolving legal issues pertaining to protecting Wyoming
interstate water rights and obligations, Wyoming water rights associated with
the Colorado river compact of 1922 and the upper Colorado river compact of
1948. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose. All proposed expenditures under this footnote shall be reported to
the management council of the legislature and the joint appropriations
committee with a description of the desired actions and outcomes of the
expenditure not less than ten (10) days before the expenditure.
Section 020. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
PROGRAM
Administration 8,810,240 8,810,240
Air Quality 9,633,870 1,846,395 16,117,500 SR 27,597,765
Water Quality 14,432,422 10,248,574 1,198,071 SR 25,879,067
Land Quality 6,196,521 4,510,334 10,706,855
Industrial Siting 769,802 769,802
Solid Waste Management 3,471,212 3,989,311 4,828,710 SR 12,289,233
Uranium Recovery Program 2,698,200 SR 2,698,200
Source Material Program 1,110,000 1,110,000
Abandoned Mine Reclam. 73,607,733 73,607,733
Subsidence Loss Ins. 231,104 SR 231,104
TOTALS 44,424,067 94,202,347 25,073,585 163,699,999
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 276
Part Time 0
TOTAL 276
13 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 021. DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT
PROGRAM
Administration 425,205 368,476 368,192 SR 1,161,873
Banking 8,330,856 SR 8,330,856
Public Fund 6,534,314 6,534,314
Mineral 3,058,811 6,057,246 202,476 SR 9,318,533
Excise 4,364,441 91,527 S7 4,455,968
TOTALS 14,382,771 6,425,722 8,993,051 29,801,544
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 103
Part Time 0
TOTAL 103
Section 023. PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
PROGRAM
Administration 800,408 10,652,833 SR 11,453,241
Consumer Advocate Div. 3,154,015 SR 3,154,015
Universal Service Fund 3,920,600 SR 3,920,600
TOTALS 0 800,408 17,727,448 18,527,856
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 42
Part Time 0
TOTAL 42
Section 024. STATE PARKS & CULTURAL RESOURCES
PROGRAM
Administration & Support 2,463,300 2,463,300
Cultural Resources 1., 2., 3., 4. 10,286,460 4,423,314 211,647 EF
235,835 S14
6,825,690 SR 21,982,946
St. Parks & Hist. Sites 20,274,129 7,657,269 167,576 EF
802,409 S14
19,527,967 SR 48,429,350
TOTALS 33,023,889 12,080,583 27,771,124 72,875,596
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 151
Part Time 67
TOTAL 218
14 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred twenty thousand dollars
($120,000.00) is appropriated for the "We the People" educational program.
No funds from this appropriation shall be expended to pay or reimburse the
University of Wyoming for indirect cost recovery or overhead expenses for the
administration of the "We the People" educational program. It is the intent
of the legislature that this appropriation be included in the department of
state parks and cultural resources' standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) is
appropriated to support the Wyoming centennial farm and ranch program. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
3. Of this general fund appropriation, four hundred forty-one thousand three
hundred forty dollars ($441,340.00) is appropriated for surveying,
documenting and three-dimensional modeling all known petroglyphs and
pictographs on state, school and institutional land in Wyoming. The
department of state parks and cultural resources may contract for the
completion of work specified in this footnote. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the standard budget of
the department of state parks and cultural resources for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
4. Of this general fund appropriation, ninety-six thousand five hundred
eleven dollars ($96,511.00) may be expended for authorized full-time and
part-time employee positions within the personal services series (100 series)
or through the contractual services series (900 series) as necessary to
ensure the state's archaeology work on human remains is completed in the most
effective and efficient manner as determined by the director of the
department of state parks and cultural resources. This appropriation shall
not be subject to Section 307 of this act.
Section 027. STATE CONSTRUCTION DEPARTMENT
PROGRAM
Operations 2,842,865 5,612,541 S5 8,455,406
School Facilities Div. 4,430,405 S5 4,430,405
Construction Management 1,703,930 1,703,930
15 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
TOTALS 4,546,795 0 10,042,946 14,589,741
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 30
Part Time 0
TOTAL 30
Section 029. WYO WATER DEVELOPMENT OFFICE
PROGRAM
Administration 9,444,380 S1 9,444,380
TOTALS 0 0 9,444,380 9,444,380
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 26
Part Time 0
TOTAL 26
Section 037. STATE ENGINEER
PROGRAM
Administration 3,853,853 3,853,853
Ground Water Div. 3,414,410 3,414,410
Surface Water Div. 2,399,426 2,399,426
Board of Control Div. 18,406,986 18,406,986
Support Services Div. 2,741,496 2,741,496
Board of Registration PE 1,238,495 SR 1,238,495
Interstate Streams Div. 1,946,519 1,946,519
North Platte Settlement 1,685,757 1,685,757
Well Drillers' Licensing 334,985 SR 334,985
TOTALS 34,448,447 0 1,573,480 36,021,927
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 111
Part Time 9
TOTAL 120
Section 039. WILDLIFE/NATURAL RESOURCE TRUST
PROGRAM
Encana Oil & Gas 35,000 SR 35,000
Administration 1., 2. 27,404,785 16,830,315 SR 44,235,100
WYCM 3,800,000 SR 3,800,000
TOTALS 27,404,785 0 20,665,315 48,070,100
16 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 2
Part Time 0
TOTAL 2
1. Of this general fund appropriation, eight million dollars ($8,000,000.00)
is appropriated to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income
account. These funds are continuously appropriated from the Wyoming wildlife
and natural resource trust income account to the Wyoming wildlife and natural
resource trust account board to provide grants for preventing the
introduction and spread of invasive plants and grasses with a focus on
private and state lands across Wyoming or for wildfire prevention measures.
This appropriation shall not be subject to the requirements of the Wyoming
Wildlife and Natural Resource Funding Act. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, nineteen million four hundred four
thousand seven hundred eighty-five dollars ($19,404,785.00) is appropriated
to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income account. Funds
subject to this footnote are continuously appropriated from the Wyoming
wildlife and natural resource trust income account to the Wyoming wildlife
and natural resource trust account board to provide grants to Wyoming
conservation districts, weed and pest districts and the game and fish
commission for purposes of restoring grass, hay and other vegetation
destroyed by wildfires on private and state lands, preventing the
establishment of nonnative, invasive terrestrial vegetation on private and
state lands affected by wildfires and replacing and restoring habitats on
private and state lands destroyed by wildfires and for wildfire prevention
measures. This appropriation shall not be subject to the requirements of the
Wyoming Wildlife and Natural Resource Funding Act. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. This appropriation is
effective immediately.
17 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 041. FIRE PREVENTION & ELEC SAFETY
PROGRAM
Administration 995,325 995,325
Fire Prevention Admin. 2,181,462 2,181,462
Electrical Safety Admin. 1,039,152 2,009,353 SR 3,048,505
Training 1,844,142 1,844,142
Fire Academy 569,284 569,284
TOTALS 6,629,365 0 2,009,353 8,638,718
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 32
Part Time 0
TOTAL 32
Section 042. GEOLOGICAL SURVEY
PROGRAM
Geologic Program 5,020,368 5,020,368
WY Min. Resource 1. 2,000,000 2,000,000
USGS Grants 218,611 218,611
TOTALS 7,020,368 218,611 0 7,238,979
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 20
Part Time 0
TOTAL 20
1. Of this general fund appropriation, two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)
is appropriated for aerial geophysical surveys to analyze Wyoming's mineral
resources. Funds from this general fund appropriation shall be expended by
the geological survey only upon the agency's good-faith effort to secure
matching funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general
funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any nonstate
source to the greatest extent possible. It is the intent of the legislature
that this appropriation not be included in the geological survey's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
18 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 044. INSURANCE DEPARTMENT
PROGRAM
Administration 7,249,451 SR 7,249,451
Health Insurance Pool 3,229,878 8,831,395 EF 12,061,273
TOTALS 3,229,878 0 16,080,846 19,310,724
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 27
Part Time 0
TOTAL 27
Section 045. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM
Administration 4,464,399 S7 4,464,399
Administrative Services 3,892,628 43,526,834 S7
15,141,597 SR 62,561,059
Law Enforcement 1., 2., 3. 5,947,078 105,013,034 S7
260,000 SR 111,220,112
WyoLink 8,600,000 1,390,241 IS
1,874,690 S7 11,864,931
Aeronautics Admin. 178,728 5,290,355 S7 5,469,083
Operational Services 4. 1,719,716 IS 1,719,716
Aeronautics 5. 5,409,342 44,993,801 131,628 IS
1,000,000 S0
12,000,000 S14
21,071,572 S7 84,606,343
TOTALS 14,009,342 55,012,235 212,884,066 281,905,643
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 553
Part Time 0
TOTAL 553
1. It is the intent of the legislature that of this other funds
appropriation, two hundred sixty-seven thousand two hundred fourteen dollars
($267,214.00)S7 for the purchase of taser equipment not be included in the
department of transportation's standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.
2. It is the intent of the legislature that of this other funds
appropriation, thirty-six thousand four hundred forty-four dollars
($36,444.00)S7 be included as an increase to the department of
19 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
transportation's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium for global positioning system mapping maintenance contracts.
3. Of this other funds appropriation, up to five hundred twenty-three
thousand two hundred seventy-seven dollars ($523,277.00)S7 may be expended
for law enforcement personnel expenses within the personal services series
(100 series) or through the contractual services series (900 series) as
necessary to meet capitol complex security needs in the most effective and
efficient manner as determined by the director of the department of
transportation. This appropriation shall not be subject to Section 307 of
this act.
4. (a) Of this other funds appropriation, one million seven hundred
nineteen thousand seven hundred sixteen dollars ($1,719,716.00)IS is
appropriated for the operation and maintenance of one (1) state-owned Cessna
citation encore jet and for costs incurred by the division of operational
services within the department to either:
(i) Ground one (1) state-owned cessna citation encore jet
airplane with the sole purpose of either using the airplane for parts or
selling parts from the airplane; or
(ii) Sell one (1) state-owned cessna citation encore jet
airplane.
(b) Proceeds from the sale of the airplane or airplane parts under
this footnote shall be deposited into the general fund.
5. Of this other funds appropriation, one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)S0
is appropriated from the transportation enterprise fund.
20 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 048. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 1.
PROGRAM
Director's Office 13,206,084 2,526,171 312,136 SR 16,044,391
Health Care Financing 2., 3. 684,214,756 1,093,284,275 5,000,000 S5
185,821,301 SR
1,450,000 TT 1,969,770,332
Public Health 4. 39,429,028 70,491,070 835,094 A4
16,028,958 SR
10,623,046 TT 137,407,196
Behavioral Health 5., 6. 290,420,555 22,268,333 791,794 A4
4,378,861 S5
56,802,815 SR
1,135,099 T3
12,072,512 TT 387,869,969
Aging 7. 41,554,542 22,742,389 15,766,556 SR 80,063,487
TOTALS 1,068,824,965 1,211,312,238 311,018,172 2,591,155,375
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 1,343
Part Time 54
TOTAL 1,397
1. (a) For the period beginning on the effective date of this footnote and
ending June 30, 2028, the department of health shall not expend any general
funds, federal funds or other funds under its control for any of the
following purposes:
(i) To pay for an elective abortion or a gender transition
procedure, or to pay for facilities, equipment or training used to carry out
an elective abortion or a gender transition procedure;
(ii) To enter into or fund any new contract or grant unless the
contract or grant expressly requires that the contracting party or grant
recipient not expend contract or grant funds to carry out an elective
abortion or a gender transition procedure, or to operate or maintain
facilities, equipment or training used to carry out an elective abortion or a
gender transition procedure.
2. In accordance with W.S. 42-2-103(d), the state supplemental security
income monthly payment amount for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending
June 30, 2028 shall be the lowest amount required under federal law in order
21 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
to remain eligible for funding under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as
amended.
3. Of this general fund appropriation, nine million nine hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($9,950,000.00), and of this federal funds appropriation,
nine million nine hundred fifty thousand dollars ($9,950,000.00), is
appropriated for provider rates for all providers serving persons with
developmental, intellectual or acquired brain injury related disabilities,
including continuation of increased provider rates funded with time-limited
funds provided under the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
4. Of this other funds appropriation, nine hundred fifty-two thousand three
hundred forty-three dollars ($952,343.00)TT is effective immediately.
5. Of this general fund appropriation, five million dollars ($5,000,000.00)
is appropriated to reimburse counties for holding and treating criminal
pretrial detainees who are awaiting a mental-health evaluation, a
determination of fitness to proceed in a criminal case or restoration to
competency to advance with criminal proceedings.
6. Of this other funds appropriation, nine million five hundred seventy-two
thousand nine hundred eighty-three dollars ($9,572,983.00)TT is effective
immediately.
7. Of this general fund appropriation, one million six hundred sixty-six
thousand six hundred fifty-three dollars ($1,666,653.00) is for senior
services in the senior care (unit 5002), and of this general fund
appropriation, one hundred fifty-one thousand one hundred ninety-five dollars
($151,195.00) is for the nutritional services unit (unit 5003). It is the
intent of the legislature that this general fund appropriation be included in
the standard budget of the department of health for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.
22 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 049. DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY SERVICES
PROGRAM
Energy Assistance & WX 23,202,140 23,202,140
Institutions 24,907,105 33,830 3,804,346 S5
588,868 SR 29,334,149
Assistance & Services 1., 2. 147,295,425 126,050,485 5,981,801 SR
3,722,070 TT 283,049,781
TOTALS 172,202,530 149,286,455 14,097,085 335,586,070
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 659
Part Time 1
TOTAL 660
1. It is the intent of the legislature that the department of family
services' standard budget be increased by eight hundred fifty thousand six
hundred seventeen dollars ($850,617.00) in general funds for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium for federally mandated supplemental nutrition
assistance program administrative costs.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, seventy-five thousand dollars
($75,000.00) is appropriated for sign language interpreters. It is the intent
of the legislature that this appropriation be included in the department of
family services' standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose.
Section 051. LIVESTOCK BOARD
PROGRAM
Administration 1,828,262 38,858 309,106 SR 2,176,226
Animal Health 1. 2,380,723 514,344 SR 2,895,067
Brucellosis 1,310,427 382,510 1,692,937
Cooperative Agreements 25,500 25,500
Estrays 38,750 38,750
Brand Inspection 1,075,901 11,560,095 SR 12,635,996
Predator Control Fees 2,255,212 SR 2,255,212
TOTALS 6,634,063 446,868 14,638,757 21,719,688
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 18
Part Time 0
TOTAL 18
23 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. It is the intent of the legislature that of this general fund
appropriation, one hundred thirty-one thousand forty dollars ($131,040.00)
not be included in the livestock board's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 053. DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE SERVICES
PROGRAM
Administration & Support 26,307,021 24,393,336 4,114,812 EF
7,967,402 SR 62,782,571
Vocational Rehab. 7,858,681 29,436,406 107,674 EF
1,266,267 SR 38,669,028
Unemployment Insurance 23,012,037 2,936,263 EF
14,879,262 SR 40,827,562
Labor Standards 2,373,876 556 3,742 EF 2,378,174
Workers' Comp. & OSHA 1. 2,888,477 66,749,756 EF 69,638,233
Disability Determination 7,734,620 7,734,620
TOTALS 36,539,578 87,465,432 98,025,178 222,030,188
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 561
Part Time 0
TOTAL 561
1. It is the intent of the legislature that the department of workforce
services' standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium not
be reduced for one-time support costs (200 series) in the amount of twenty-
one thousand dollars ($21,000.00)EF as presented in the department of
workforce services' 2027-2028 biennial budget request.
Section 055. OIL AND GAS COMMISSION
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 275,074 11,378,768 SR 11,653,842
Orphan Wells 7,526,087 SR 7,526,087
TOTALS 0 275,074 18,904,855 19,179,929
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 40
Part Time 0
TOTAL 40
24 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. It is the intent of the legislature that of this other funds
appropriation, three hundred sixteen thousand nine hundred thirty-five
dollars ($316,935.00)SR not be included in the oil and gas conservation
commission's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium
and that any request for appropriations for major maintenance be included as
an exception request for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
Section 057. COMMUNITY COLLEGE COMMISSION
PROGRAM
Administration 7,922,961 781,351 SR 8,704,312
State Aid 1., 2., 3., 6., 7. 260,319,957 260,319,957
WY Works Program 4., 5. 5,584,486 5,584,486
Adult Education 2,025,877 1,903,127 3,929,004
WYIN Loan & Grant Prgm 7,521,256 7,521,256
Veterans' Tuition Waiver 481,250 481,250
Public Television 3,420,181 400,000 SR 3,820,181
TOTALS 287,275,968 1,903,127 1,181,351 290,360,446
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 12
Part Time 0
TOTAL 12
1. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, seven hundred fifty thousand
four hundred fifty dollars ($750,450.00) is appropriated for a competitive
grant program to provide enhanced state funding to community colleges for
purposes of dual enrollment education, subject to the following:
(i) Preference for grant funding shall be provided to community
colleges offering dual enrollment programs to students who are not eligible
to participate under a school district agreement entered into pursuant to
W.S. 21-20-201;
(ii) The community college commission and any community college
receiving grant funding shall advertise the program and track expenditures,
student participation and outcomes. Recommendations for continued funding or
modifications to law shall be included in the community college commission's
budget request for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium;
(iii) This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended
for any other purpose;
25 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
(iv) It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
not be included in the Wyoming community college commission's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, seven million five hundred thousand
dollars ($7,500,000.00) is appropriated for career and technical education
programs, degrees and certifications requiring two (2) years of instruction
or less for completion. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the Wyoming community college commission's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
3. Of this general fund appropriation, eight hundred thousand dollars
($800,000.00) is appropriated to support competitive rodeo teams at Wyoming
community colleges. This appropriation shall be equally distributed to all
colleges with a competitive rodeo program. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
4. Of this general fund appropriation, five million dollars ($5,000,000.00)
is appropriated to the Wyoming works program account and all funds within the
Wyoming works program account are appropriated and available for expenditure
by the Wyoming community college commission as provided by the Wyoming works
program.
5. Of this general fund appropriation, five hundred eighty-four thousand
four hundred eighty-six dollars ($584,486.00) is appropriated to the Wyoming
works student grant account and all funds within the Wyoming works student
grant account are appropriated for distribution by the Wyoming community
college commission as provided by the Wyoming works program.
6. Of this general fund appropriation, five million dollars ($5,000,000.00)
is appropriated for distribution by the commission to qualifying community
colleges as provided in W.S. 21-18-205.
7. Of this general fund appropriation, no funds shall be expended to pay
student athletes salaries or endorsement compensation for participation in
athletic activities sponsored by a community college.
26 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 060. STATE LANDS AND INVESTMENTS
PROGRAM
Operations 13,796,025 53,407,335 2,596,063 S1
2,962,326 S4
314,240 S5
7,822,533 SR 80,898,522
Forestry 1. 8,173,613 914,052 227,385 SR 9,315,050
County Emergency Suppr. 20,000,000 12,124,796 SR 32,124,796
Fire 2., 3. 15,269,494 302,101 15,571,595
Forestry Performance Acct. 80,000 SR 80,000
Ranch A 16,000 SR 16,000
Mineral Royalty Grants 4. 30,237,674 S4 30,237,674
Federal Forestry Grants 6,939,060 6,939,060
Fire Prot. Revolving Acct. 5. 26,415,498 SR 26,415,498
Good Neighbor Authority 14,429,864 14,429,864
Transp. Enterprise Fund 3,024,046 SR 3,024,046
Farm Loan Reserve 5,000,000 SR 5,000,000
TOTALS 57,239,132 75,992,412 90,820,561 224,052,105
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES 2., 3.
Full Time 108
Part Time 28
TOTAL 136
1. The office of state lands and investments is authorized to hire up to one
(1) additional at-will employee contract position within the forestry
division only when federal funds are received that reimburse the state for
one hundred percent (100%) of the costs of the position. In the event
federal funding becomes unavailable to maintain one hundred percent (100%)
reimbursement for a position filled pursuant to this footnote, the position
shall be eliminated. The office of state lands and investments shall notify
the joint appropriations committee of any position created or eliminated
pursuant to this footnote through the B-11 process as authorized by W.S.
9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1013(b).
2. Of this general fund appropriation, four million six hundred eighty‑one
thousand one hundred sixty‑six dollars ($4,681,166.00) is appropriated, and
four (4) full-time employee positions and twenty (20) nine (9) month
temporary full-time positions are authorized as seasonal, part-time positions
for two (2) wildland fire module crews. This appropriation and the positions
specified in this footnote are effective immediately. Of this general fund
appropriation, four million six hundred eighty-one thousand one hundred
27 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
sixty-six dollars ($4,681,166.00) shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00) for
every one dollar ($1.00) up to four million six hundred eighty-one thousand
one hundred sixty-six dollars ($4,681,166.00) appropriated from any source to
the office of state lands and investments in 2026 House Bill 0036, if enacted
into law. One (1) full-time employee position or one (1) part-time employee
position shall be reduced from the full-time employee positions and part-time
employee positions specified in this footnote for each one (1) full-time
employee position or one (1) part-time employee position authorized in 2026
House Bill 0036, if enacted into law.
3. Of these authorized part-time employees, four (4) positions shall be
temporary full-time positions authorized as seasonal part-time positions
related to the state's single engine air tanker program.
4. Of this other funds appropriation, eleven million two hundred thousand
dollars ($11,200,000.00)S4, or as much thereof as may be available, shall
only be effective upon a successful federal coal lease auction in Wyoming and
receipt by the state treasurer of the first annual bonus payment from the
successful bidder.
5. The de minimis indirect cost rate the state of Wyoming charges the
federal government for administrative overhead related to expenditures on
wildland fires shall be adjusted to the federally approved de minimis rate of
fifteen percent (15%), with the consent of the appropriate federal agency.
All proceeds received from the difference between the previous rate and new
rate shall be deposited into the fire protection revolving account.
Section 063. GOVERNOR'S RESIDENCE
PROGRAM
Residence Operation 729,283 729,283
TOTALS 729,283 0 0 729,283
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 2
Part Time 0
TOTAL 2
28 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 066. WYOMING TOURISM BOARD
PROGRAM
Wyoming Tourism Board 40,102,837 S14
23,600 SR 40,126,437
TOTALS 0 0 40,126,437 40,126,437
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 067. UNIVERSITY OF WYOMING 1.
PROGRAM
State Aid 2., 3., 4., 8., 9. 369,785,349 369,785,349
School of Energy Res. 5., 6. 33,197,808 33,197,808
Tier 1 Engineering 18,584,703 18,584,703
NCAR MOU 1,528,316 1,528,316
Endowments & Matching 7., 10. 2,750,000 2,750,000
TOTALS 425,846,176 0 0 425,846,176
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
1. (a) For the period beginning on the effective date of this footnote and
ending June 30, 2028, and in addition to the requirements of W.S.
21-16-1801(a), the University of Wyoming shall not expend any funds under its
control for any of the following:
(i) Elective abortions for students;
(ii) Group health insurance that provides coverage of elective
abortions for students.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000.00) is appropriated for an external financial and administrative
audit and operational review by a qualified management consultant of
expenditures of the center of innovation for flow through porous media and
expenditures at the high bay research facility at the University of Wyoming.
The qualified management consultant shall conduct the external financial and
administrative audit and operational review required under this footnote in
29 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
consultation with the management council. The University of Wyoming shall
include a condensed summary of findings and recommendations from the audit
and review in any budget request submitted under W.S. 9-2-1013. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
University of Wyoming's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose.
3. Of this general fund appropriation, four hundred thousand dollars
($400,000.00) is appropriated to support the University of Wyoming rodeo
team.
4. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00) is appropriated to provide a state match for funds received
by the University of Wyoming from athletic booster organizations and from
persons donating funds to be used solely for athletic programs, subject to
all of the following:
(i) The state treasurer shall retain this appropriation for
distribution in accordance with the provisions of this footnote;
(ii) This appropriation shall be expended for the purposes of:
(A) Authorized recruitment of prospective student athletes
to the University of Wyoming and expenses associated with participation in
intercollegiate athletics including summer school attendance, nutrition,
tutoring, team travel and costs directly related to participation in
competition;
(B) Athletic training equipment.
(iii) No funds from this appropriation shall be expended for
salaries or capital construction projects;
(iv) To the extent funds are available, this appropriation shall
be matched on a quarterly basis by the state treasurer for each cash or cash
equivalent contribution actually received by the University of Wyoming for
the purposes specified in this footnote for the period beginning July 1, 2026
and ending June 30, 2028 by distributing to the University of Wyoming an
amount equal to the amount of qualifying contributions for the calendar
30 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
quarter.
(b) The appropriation specified in subsection (a) of this footnote
shall not be transferred or expended for any purpose not specified in this
footnote and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028.
5. Of this general fund appropriation, two million ninety thousand dollars
($2,090,000.00) is effective immediately.
6. Of this general fund appropriation, ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00)
is appropriated and conditioned upon matching funds in the ratio of one
dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar
($1.00) of matching funds from any nonstate source for support for the school
of energy resources' Wyoming energy-focused instruction, outreach and
research programs. All proposed matches shall be reported to the management
council of the legislature with a description of the matching funds along
with the purpose and anticipated outcomes not less than ten (10) days before
acceptance of the funds.
7. Of this general fund appropriation, two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000.00) is appropriated for the purpose of providing a state
match for funds received by the University of Wyoming or donated funds to be
used solely for support for excellence in research, education and extension
in ranch and rangeland management, agronomy and soil science. Distribution of
this appropriation is conditioned upon a match of funds in the ratio of one
dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar
($1.00) of matching funds from any nonstate source. This appropriation shall
be retained by the state treasurer for distribution in accordance with W.S.
21-16-904. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, any
unexpended, unobligated monies from this appropriation shall not revert until
June 30, 2032. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
not be included in the University of Wyoming's standard budget for
the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
8. Of this general fund appropriation, no funds shall be expended to pay
student athletes salaries or endorsement compensation for participation in
athletic activities sponsored by the University of Wyoming.
31 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
9. (a) A portion of this general fund appropriation shall be expended by
the University of Wyoming to conduct a comprehensive review of its
organizational structure and staffing patterns across all divisions,
colleges, administrative units, auxiliaries and support functions. The
review under this footnote shall, at a minimum:
(i) Identify any positions or organizational units that are
duplicative, overlapping or functionally redundant;
(ii) Assess opportunities to consolidate, streamline or
otherwise restructure administrative and academic operations in order to
improve efficiency;
(iii) Evaluate staffing levels relative to similarly situated
postsecondary institutions and industry standards;
(iv) Develop recommendations to reduce the overall number of
positions while simultaneously considering the operational needs, service
levels and institutional priorities of the University of Wyoming;
(v) Identify any potential cost savings and reinvestment
opportunities that result from any recommended staffing or structural
changes;
(vi) Compile an inventory and recommend opportunities to
eliminate degree programs with consideration of course participation and the
number of recent graduates;
(vii) Compile an inventory and recommend opportunities to
further restrict any diversity, equity and inclusion program, activity or
function.
(b) The University of Wyoming board of trustees shall submit an
operational plan to the governor and the joint appropriations committee not
later than December 1, 2026. If the operational plan under this subsection
does not identify at least five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) in cost
savings for the University of Wyoming by December 1, 2026, of this general
fund appropriation, ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) shall not be
effective. If at least five million dollars ($5,000,000.00) in cost savings
for the University of Wyoming is identified by December 1, 2026, of this
32 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
general fund appropriation, ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) is effective
March 15, 2027.
10. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000.00) shall be for the University of Wyoming family residency program
to be expended only for purposes of a rural medicine training track program
in a critical access hospital. This appropriation is conditioned upon
matching funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general
funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any nonstate
source. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the University of Wyoming's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.
Section 069. WICHE
PROGRAM
Administration & Grants 5,432,417 5,432,417
TOTALS 5,432,417 0 0 5,432,417
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 070. ENHANCED OIL RECOVERY COMM
PROGRAM
Commission & Support 1,000,792 1,000,792
Tech. Outreach & Research 4,154,737 4,154,737
TOTALS 5,155,529 0 0 5,155,529
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
33 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 072. RETIREMENT SYSTEM
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 23,095,468 PF 23,095,468
Highway Patrol 15,301 SR 15,301
Game & Fish-Wardens 20,952 SR 20,952
Deferred Compensation 1,865,011 P2 1,865,011
TOTALS 0 0 24,996,732 24,996,732
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 50
Part Time 0
TOTAL 50
1. (a) The Wyoming retirement board, with the approval of the human
resources division of the department of administration and information, may:
(i) Approve reclassifications from investment analyst to senior
investment analyst and senior investment analyst to investment officer;
(ii) Adjust compensation within the classifications specified in
paragraph (i) of this footnote based on an assessment of an employee's
education, certification, demonstrated performance and potential for
increased responsibility.
(b) Nothing in this footnote should be construed to modify the maximum
annual salary limits provided in W.S. 9-3-406(f).
Section 077. ENTERPRISE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES
PROGRAM
Enterprise Operations 1., 2. 86,172,033 86,172,033
IT Enhanced Services 3. 37,769,156 IS
621,545 S0 38,390,701
WUN Infrastructure 15,991,931 S5 15,991,931
TOTALS 86,172,033 0 54,382,632 140,554,665
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 237
Part Time 1
TOTAL 238
34 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. Of this general fund appropriation, seven hundred forty-three thousand
five hundred twenty-four dollars ($743,524.00) is effective immediately.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, five million two hundred sixty-one
thousand nine hundred thirty-four dollars ($5,261,934.00) is appropriated for
compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act, P.L. 101-336 as amended,
to ensure all citizen-facing websites and web applications are accessible.
The department of enterprise technology services shall seek grant funding
from federal and other sources to the greatest extent possible. This
appropriation shall be reduced in an amount equal to one dollar ($1.00) of
appropriated general funds for each one dollar ($1.00) in grant funding
received for the purposes of this footnote. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.
3. Of this other funds appropriation, six hundred twenty-one thousand five
hundred forty-five dollars ($621,545.00)S0 or as much thereof as is available
is appropriated from the depreciation reserve account for procurement of
cloud services. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
not be included in the department of enterprise technology services' standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
Section 080. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
PROGRAM
Administration Services 1.,
2., 3. 22,771,377 198,932 5,344,661 EF
1,552,829 SR 29,867,799
Field Services 4. 36,648,353 173,482 5,004,763 TT 41,826,598
Support Services 5., 6., 7. 87,541,728 100,000 1,398,146 SR
4,263,454 TT 93,303,328
Prison Division 8., 9. 178,424,258 174,207 EF
1,656,765 IS
362,594 SR 180,617,824
TOTALS 325,385,716 472,414 19,757,419 345,615,549
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 1,048
Part Time 3
TOTAL 1,051
35 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. Of this general fund appropriation, five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00) is for recruitment and retention efforts within the department
of corrections, including moving expenses, housing costs at the law
enforcement academy, career fairs, sign-on bonuses, accelerated background
checks and site specific staff retention efforts. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, nine million three hundred twelve
thousand three hundred seventy-four dollars ($9,312,374.00) is effective
immediately.
3. Of this general fund appropriation, seven hundred seventy-three thousand
four hundred thirty-six dollars ($773,436.00) is effective immediately.
4. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000.00) is appropriated for increased daily rates for placement of
felony offenders in county jails.
5. Of this general fund appropriation, seven hundred seventy-nine thousand
four hundred fourteen dollars ($779,414.00) is effective immediately.
6. Of this general fund appropriation, three million dollars ($3,000,000.00)
is effective immediately.
7. Of this general fund appropriation, one million four hundred fifteen
thousand one hundred forty-four dollars ($1,415,144.00) is effective
immediately.
8. Of this general fund appropriation, seven million five hundred fifty-nine
thousand ninety-four dollars ($7,559,094.00) is effective immediately.
9. Of this general fund appropriation, one million three hundred fifty-nine
thousand three hundred eleven dollars ($1,359,311.00) is effective
immediately.
Section 081. BOARD OF PAROLE
PROGRAM
Administration 1,766,697 1,766,697
TOTALS 1,766,697 0 0 1,766,697
36 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 6
Part Time 0
TOTAL 6
Section 085. WYOMING BUSINESS COUNCIL
PROGRAM
Wyoming Business Council 1. 6,931,832 145,002 SR 7,076,834
Economic Divers. 2. 7,027,270 157,787 846,741 SR 8,031,798
TOTALS 13,959,102 157,787 991,743 15,108,632
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
1. Of this general fund appropriation, six million nine hundred thirty-one
thousand eight hundred thirty-two dollars ($6,931,832.00) and of this other
funds appropriation one hundred forty-five thousand two dollars ($145,002.00)
SR, shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2027.
It is the intent of the legislature that the Wyoming business council include
any requested amount for the Wyoming business council and any of its programs
for the period beginning July 1, 2027 and ending June 30, 2028 in any budget
request submitted under W.S. 9-2-1013.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, not less than one million four
hundred thirteen thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,413,800.00) is
appropriated for strategic partnership with manufacturing works, not less
than one million two hundred eighty-eight thousand seven hundred sixty
dollars ($1,288,760.00) is appropriated for strategic partnership with the
Wyoming small business development center network, and not less than six
hundred thousand dollars ($600,000.00) is appropriated for strategic
partnership with the Wyoming women's business center. Of the remaining
general fund appropriations, three million seven hundred twenty-four thousand
seven hundred ten dollars ($3,724,710.00) shall be for the period beginning
July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2027 and any reductions to funding for
strategic partners from this amount shall be proportionately applied to all
strategic partners.
37 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 090. WYOMING ENERGY AUTHORITY
PROGRAM
Administration 5,226,199 5,226,199
TOTALS 5,226,199 0 0 5,226,199
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 091. WYOMING STABLE TOKEN COMMISSION
PROGRAM
Administration 1., 2. 4,000,000 4,000,000
TOTALS 4,000,000 0 0 4,000,000
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
1. The legislature authorizes six (6) at-will employee contract positions in
accordance with W.S. 9-2-3207(a)(xi)(F)(VI) for the Wyoming stable token
commission for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028.
2. It is the intent of the legislature that, of this general fund
appropriation, four million dollars ($4,000,000.00) shall not be included in
the Wyoming stable token commission's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium, and that any budget request for the Wyoming
stable token commission be included as an exception budget request for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
Section 096. STATE BUDGET DEPARTMENT
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 3,420,688 3,420,688
Grants Management Office 2. 4,551,086 4,551,086
TOTALS 7,971,774 0 0 7,971,774
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 2. 10
Part Time 0
TOTAL 10
38 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. (a) Authorization for at-will employee contract positions supported by
funds originating from section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021,
P.L. 117-2, shall remain effective until the latter of:
(i) December 31, 2026;
(ii) The date of completion of any federally required reporting
and audits; or
(iii) The date of any extension of federal expenditure deadlines
under section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2,
enacted into law.
2. Of these full-time employees, two (2) full-time employees are transferred
from the department of corrections.
Section 098. OFFICE OF GUARDIAN AD LITEM
PROGRAM
Guardian Ad Litem 4,304,653 1,081,920 SR 5,386,573
TOTALS 4,304,653 0 1,081,920 5,386,573
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 9
Part Time 0
TOTAL 9
Section 101. SUPREME COURT
PROGRAM
Administration 14,052,880 754,096 4,287,729 SR 19,094,705
Judicial Nominating Comm. 34,942 34,942
Chancery Court 1,293,369 1,293,369
Law Library 1,232,179 1,232,179
Circuit Courts 1. 38,496,198 38,496,198
Court Automation 8,524,151 9,406,007 SR 17,930,158
Judicial Retirement 1,750,598 1,750,598
Treatment Court 3,139,513 1,400,000 SR
2,398,072 TT 6,937,585
Branchwide Resources 1,153,923 1,153,923
TOTALS 69,677,753 754,096 17,491,808 87,923,657
39 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 217
Part Time 21
TOTAL 238
1. Of this general fund appropriation, the supreme court may transfer up to
eighty-three thousand five hundred dollars ($83,500.00) to district courts
for replacement of aging copiers. Any transfers of this appropriation shall
not be subject to the maximum thresholds or reporting requirements prescribed
in Section 306 of this act.
Section 102. BOARD OF LAW EXAMINERS
PROGRAM
Administration 243,037 SR 243,037
TOTALS 0 0 243,037 243,037
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 103. COMM ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT & ETHICS
PROGRAM
Administration 371,171 371,171
TOTALS 371,171 0 0 371,171
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 1
Part Time 0
TOTAL 1
Section 120. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 1A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,425,926 1,425,926
TOTALS 1,425,926 0 0 1,425,926
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
40 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 121. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 1B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,317,869 1,317,869
TOTALS 1,317,869 0 0 1,317,869
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 122. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 2A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,402,302 1,402,302
TOTALS 1,402,302 0 0 1,402,302
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 123. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 2B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,325,681 1,325,681
TOTALS 1,325,681 0 0 1,325,681
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 124. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 3B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,385,512 1,385,512
TOTALS 1,385,512 0 0 1,385,512
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
41 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 125. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 3A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,399,822 1,399,822
TOTALS 1,399,822 0 0 1,399,822
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 126. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 4A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,354,584 1,354,584
TOTALS 1,354,584 0 0 1,354,584
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 127. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 5A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,355,115 1,355,115
TOTALS 1,355,115 0 0 1,355,115
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 128. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 5B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,361,557 1,361,557
TOTALS 1,361,557 0 0 1,361,557
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
42 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 129. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 6A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,356,096 1,356,096
TOTALS 1,356,096 0 0 1,356,096
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 130. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 7A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,452,401 1,452,401
TOTALS 1,452,401 0 0 1,452,401
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 1
TOTAL 5
Section 131. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 7B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,532,143 1,532,143
TOTALS 1,532,143 0 0 1,532,143
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 1
TOTAL 5
Section 132. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 9A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,371,526 1,371,526
TOTALS 1,371,526 0 0 1,371,526
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
43 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 133. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 8A
PROGRAM
Administration 1,349,427 1,349,427
TOTALS 1,349,427 0 0 1,349,427
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 134. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 9B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,616,810 1,616,810
TOTALS 1,616,810 0 0 1,616,810
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 135. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 6B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,322,372 1,322,372
TOTALS 1,322,372 0 0 1,322,372
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 136. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 8B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,335,901 1,335,901
TOTALS 1,335,901 0 0 1,335,901
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
44 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 137. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 1C
PROGRAM
Administration 1,555,804 1,555,804
TOTALS 1,555,804 0 0 1,555,804
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 5
Part Time 0
TOTAL 5
Section 138. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 3C
PROGRAM
Administration 1,371,626 1,371,626
TOTALS 1,371,626 0 0 1,371,626
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 139. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 7C
PROGRAM
Administration 1,392,906 1,392,906
TOTALS 1,392,906 0 0 1,392,906
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 140. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 6C
PROGRAM
Administration 1,381,128 1,381,128
TOTALS 1,381,128 0 0 1,381,128
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
45 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 141. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 9C
PROGRAM
Administration 1,307,284 1,307,284
TOTALS 1,307,284 0 0 1,307,284
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 142. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 4B
PROGRAM
Administration 1,250,514 1,250,514
TOTALS 1,250,514 0 0 1,250,514
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 143. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 1D
PROGRAM
Administration 1,326,803 1,326,803
TOTALS 1,326,803 0 0 1,326,803
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 144. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 7D
PROGRAM
Administration 1,333,903 1,333,903
TOTALS 1,333,903 0 0 1,333,903
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
46 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 145. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 3D
PROGRAM
Administration 1,343,842 1,343,842
TOTALS 1,343,842 0 0 1,343,842
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 146. JUDICIAL DISTRICT 6D
PROGRAM
Administration 1,374,252 1,374,252
TOTALS 1,374,252 0 0 1,374,252
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 151. DISTRICT ATTORNEY/JUD DIST #1
PROGRAM
Administration 5,918,081 718,561 SR 6,636,642
TOTALS 5,918,081 0 718,561 6,636,642
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 24
Part Time 0
TOTAL 24
Section 157. DISTRICT ATTORNEY/JUD DIST #7
PROGRAM
Administration 6,369,152 289,392 SR 6,658,544
TOTALS 6,369,152 0 289,392 6,658,544
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 24
Part Time 0
TOTAL 24
47 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 160. COUNTY & PROS ATTORNEYS
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 9,780,000 9,780,000
TOTALS 9,780,000 0 0 9,780,000
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
1. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, in addition to amounts specified
under W.S. 18-3-107(f):
(i) Four hundred sixty-four thousand six hundred two dollars
($464,602.00) is appropriated for each fiscal year for the period beginning
July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028 to provide increased state
contributions to counties for compensation of elected county and prosecuting
attorneys and shall be distributed proportionally among each of the twenty-
one (21) participating counties;
(ii) One million thirty-five thousand three hundred ninety-eight
dollars ($1,035,398.00) is appropriated for each fiscal year for the period
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028 to provide increased state
contributions to counties for compensation of assistant county and
prosecuting attorneys and shall be distributed in proportion to the state
payments specified in W.S. 18-3-107(f) for assistant county and prosecuting
attorneys.
Section 205. EDUCATION-SCHOOL FINANCE
PROGRAM
School Foundation Program 1. 2,187,278,262 S5 2,187,278,262
Court Ordered Placements 17,183,639 S5 17,183,639
Foundation-Specials 5,765,000 S5 5,765,000
TOTALS 0 0 2,210,226,901 2,210,226,901
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
1. Of this other funds appropriation, twenty-one million nine hundred
thousand dollars ($21,900,000.00)S5 is appropriated for school district
48 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
entitlement payments paid in accordance with W.S. 21-13-313(c). This
appropriation shall only be effective if 2026 House Bill 0045 or 2026 Senate
File 0039 is enacted into law.
Section 206. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
PROGRAM
Education Boards 1. 205,261 719,112 S5
507,043 SR 1,431,416
Leadership, Finance & IT 11,041,428 17,179 5,703,651 S5
400,000 SR 17,162,258
Accountability & Commun. 901,271 32,799,740 9,587,551 S5
210,894 SR
1,000 T0 43,500,456
School Support 2., 3. 5,123,514 317,025,857 2,280,086 S5
5,692,747 SR
468,495 T0 330,590,699
TOTALS 17,271,474 349,842,776 25,570,579 392,684,829
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 116
Part Time 2
TOTAL 118
1. Of this other funds appropriation, four hundred seven thousand one
hundred fifteen dollars ($407,115.00)SR is provided for compensation for the
position of executive director for the Wyoming charter school authorizing
board. Upon the next vacancy of the position of executive director for the
Wyoming charter school authorizing board, the Wyoming charter school
authorizing board shall request a reclassification of the position by the
human resources division of the department of administration and information
to align the compensation and pay bands commensurate with the duties of the
position and comparable executive level positions within the department of
education with similar roles and responsibilities. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000.00) is appropriated for state-funded farm to school grants to
increase local food procurement. It is the intent of the legislature that
this appropriation be included in the department of education's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
49 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
3. Of this general fund appropriation, fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)
is appropriated to pay for processing costs for Wyoming poultry, lamb, pork,
beef or bison donated to a school district to be used in school meals.
Expenditures authorized in this footnote shall be made only if an equal
amount of funding has been contributed by a local school district for the
processing costs of the donated Wyoming poultry, lamb, pork, beef or bison.
The department shall endeavor to provide funding to as many school districts
as possible under this footnote and participation in the federal school lunch
program shall not be used as a limiting criterion for the distribution of
these funds. To the extent all funds from this appropriation are expended,
the department of education shall identify and expend any additional funds
appropriated in this section for continuation of the expenditures under this
footnote.
Section 211. BOARD OF EQUALIZATION
PROGRAM
Equalization/Tax Appeals 1,795,310 1,795,310
TOTALS 1,795,310 0 0 1,795,310
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 5
Part Time 0
TOTAL 5
Section 220. ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY COUNCIL
PROGRAM
Administration 610,603 610,603
TOTALS 610,603 0 0 610,603
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 2
Part Time 0
TOTAL 2
Section 270. OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS
PROGRAM
Administration 4,691,869 SR 4,691,869
TOTALS 0 0 4,691,869 4,691,869
50 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 12
Part Time 0
TOTAL 12
Section 012. BOARD OF ARCHITECTS AND LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTS
PROGRAM
Administration 243,349 SR 243,349
TOTALS 0 0 243,349 243,349
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 016. BOARD OF BARBER EXAMINERS
PROGRAM
Administration 57,711 SR 57,711
TOTALS 0 0 57,711 57,711
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 017. BOARD OF RADIOLOGIC TECHNOLOGISTS EXAMINERS
PROGRAM
Administration 101,905 SR 101,905
TOTALS 0 0 101,905 101,905
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
51 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 018. REAL ESTATE COMMISSION
PROGRAM
Administration 1,474,948 SR 1,474,948
Real Estate Recovery 10,047 SR 10,047
Real Estate Education 81,771 SR 81,771
Real Estate Appraiser 314,360 SR 314,360
Appraiser Education 29,133 SR 29,133
Appraisal Management 429,914 SR 429,914
TOTALS 0 0 2,340,173 2,340,173
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 6
Part Time 0
TOTAL 6
Section 019. PROFESSIONAL TEACHING STANDARDS BOARD
PROGRAM
Prof. Teaching Stds. Board 2,341,039 SR 2,341,039
TOTALS 0 0 2,341,039 2,341,039
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 8
Part Time 0
TOTAL 8
Section 022. BOARD FOR RESPIRATORY CARE
PROGRAM
Administration 79,528 SR 79,528
TOTALS 0 0 79,528 79,528
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 028. BOARD OF REGISTRATION IN PODIATRY
PROGRAM
Administration 33,957 SR 33,957
TOTALS 0 0 33,957 33,957
52 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 030. BOARD OF CHIROPRACTIC EXAMINERS
PROGRAM
Administration 165,430 SR 165,430
TOTALS 0 0 165,430 165,430
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 031. COLLECTION AGENCY BOARD
PROGRAM
Administration 235,071 SR 235,071
TOTALS 0 0 235,071 235,071
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 033. BOARD OF COSMETOLOGY
PROGRAM
Administration 1,215,685 SR 1,215,685
TOTALS 0 0 1,215,685 1,215,685
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 4
Part Time 0
TOTAL 4
Section 034. BOARD OF DENTAL EXAMINERS
PROGRAM
Administration 392,180 SR 392,180
TOTALS 0 0 392,180 392,180
53 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 035. BOARD OF FUNERAL SERVICE PRACTITIONERS
PROGRAM
Administration 100,598 SR 100,598
TOTALS 0 0 100,598 100,598
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 036. BOARD OF MIDWIFERY
PROGRAM
Administration 34,877 SR 34,877
TOTALS 0 0 34,877 34,877
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 038. WYOMING GAMING COMMISSION
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 6,087,915 SR 6,087,915
TOTALS 0 0 6,087,915 6,087,915
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 15
Part Time 2
TOTAL 17
1. Pursuant to W.S. 11-25-201(j), Wyoming gaming commission expenditures for
breeder awards are authorized by the legislature for the period beginning
July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028.
54 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 043. DIETETICS LICENSING BOARD
PROGRAM
Administration 51,188 SR 51,188
TOTALS 0 0 51,188 51,188
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 046. WYOMING COMBAT SPORTS COMMISSION
PROGRAM
Administration 68,618 SR 68,618
TOTALS 0 0 68,618 68,618
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 052. BOARD OF MEDICINE
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 3,743,513 SR 3,743,513
TOTALS 0 0 3,743,513 3,743,513
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 7
Part Time 0
TOTAL 7
1. Of this other funds appropriation, seven hundred ten thousand twenty-four
dollars ($710,024.00)SR is effective immediately.
Section 054. BOARD OF NURSING
PROGRAM
Administration 3,494,590 SR 3,494,590
TOTALS 0 0 3,494,590 3,494,590
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 10
Part Time 0
TOTAL 10
55 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 056. BOARD OF EXAMINERS IN OPTOMETRY
PROGRAM
Administration 115,633 SR 115,633
TOTALS 0 0 115,633 115,633
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 058. BOARD OF EXAMINERS OF SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY & AUDIOLOGY
PROGRAM
Administration 126,217 SR 126,217
TOTALS 0 0 126,217 126,217
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 059. BOARD OF PHARMACY
PROGRAM
Licensing Board 2,194,817 SR 2,194,817
TOTALS 0 0 2,194,817 2,194,817
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 6
Part Time 0
TOTAL 6
Section 061. BOARD OF CERTIFIED PUBLIC ACCOUNTANTS
PROGRAM
Administration 837,375 SR 837,375
TOTALS 0 0 837,375 837,375
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 2
Part Time 0
TOTAL 2
56 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 062. BOARD OF PHYSICAL THERAPY
PROGRAM
Administration 177,607 SR 177,607
TOTALS 0 0 177,607 177,607
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 064. BOARD OF HEARING AID SPECIALISTS
PROGRAM
Administration 38,175 SR 38,175
TOTALS 0 0 38,175 38,175
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 065. BOARD OF ATHLETIC TRAINERS
PROGRAM
Administration 31,812 SR 31,812
TOTALS 0 0 31,812 31,812
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 068. BOARD OF PSYCHOLOGY
PROGRAM
Administration 197,527 SR 197,527
TOTALS 0 0 197,527 197,527
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
57 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 075. BOARD OF OUTFITTERS AND GUIDES
PROGRAM
Administration 993,240 SR 993,240
TOTALS 0 0 993,240 993,240
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 3
Part Time 0
TOTAL 3
Section 078. MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONS LICENSING BOARD
PROGRAM
Administration 713,169 SR 713,169
TOTALS 0 0 713,169 713,169
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 079. BOARD OF NURSING HOME ADMINISTRATORS
PROGRAM
Administration 64,685 SR 64,685
TOTALS 0 0 64,685 64,685
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 083. BOARD OF OCCUPATIONAL THERAPY
PROGRAM
Administration 149,051 SR 149,051
TOTALS 0 0 149,051 149,051
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
58 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 084. BOARD OF PROFESSIONAL GEOLOGISTS
PROGRAM
Administration 234,438 SR 234,438
TOTALS 0 0 234,438 234,438
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 251. BOARD OF VETERINARY MEDICINE
PROGRAM
Administration 152,072 SR 152,072
TOTALS 0 0 152,072 152,072
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
Section 252. BOARD OF ACUPUNCTURE
PROGRAM
Administration 51,812 SR 51,812
TOTALS 0 0 51,812 51,812
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
59 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
[BUDGET BALANCERS - TRANSFERS]
Section 300.
(a) The state auditor shall transfer any unappropriated funds in the
general fund on June 30, 2026 in excess of one hundred ninety-two million
seven hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($192,765,000.00) to the
legislative stabilization reserve account.
(b) The state auditor shall transfer a total of one hundred thirty-
eight million nine hundred seventy-four thousand six hundred eighty-eight
dollars ($138,974,688.00) from the strategic investments and projects account
to the general fund in one (1) or more transfers. Any amounts transferred to
the general fund under this subsection prior to June 30, 2026 shall be
subtracted from the calculation of the transfer of funds from the budget
reserve account to the legislative stabilization reserve account as required
by 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 300(b). This subsection
is effective immediately.
(c) The state auditor shall transfer forty-four million three hundred
forty-eight thousand one hundred thirty-one dollars ($44,348,131.00) from the
general fund to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund.
(d) The state auditor shall transfer eighty-eight million seven
hundred forty-two thousand one hundred seventy-six dollars ($88,742,176.00)
from the school foundation program reserve account to the public school
foundation program account.
(e) The state auditor shall transfer two hundred twenty-eight million
six hundred thousand dollars ($228,600,000.00), or as much thereof as is
available from the unexpended, unobligated balance of the strategic
investments and projects account to the general fund. This subsection shall
not be effective if Senate File 0119 is enacted into law.
[BORROWING AUTHORITY - CASH FLOW AND EXECUTIVE PROGRAMS]
Section 301.
(a) The state auditor is authorized to borrow from the legislative
stabilization reserve account amounts necessary to assist the state's general
fund cash flow. The amounts borrowed shall be repaid when sufficient general
fund revenue is available. The auditor shall borrow funds under this
subsection only to assist the month-to-month cash flow of the general fund
and shall not borrow funds under this subsection when total appropriations
together with outstanding encumbrances and obligations for the biennium
exceed projected revenues for the biennium.
60 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) The governor is authorized to borrow from the legislative
stabilization reserve account up to thirty million dollars ($30,000,000.00)
as necessary to meet funding requirements to fight wildfires in the event
reserve funds in the office of state lands and investments' forestry division
have been exhausted. The governor shall report to the joint appropriations
committee, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives immediately upon exercise of this authority.
[STATE MILITARY DEPARTMENT LANDS – FIRE SUPPRESSION]
Section 302.
(a) The governor is authorized to reimburse the costs of suppressing
fires that burn on, have burned on, originate on or have originated on any
state lands managed by the military department, subject to the requirements
of this section.
(b) No reimbursement shall be made under this section except upon the
written approval of the state forester. The governor and the state forester
may consult with the adjutant general as necessary to implement this section.
(c) The governor shall, for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and
ending June 30, 2028, reimburse fire suppression costs under this section in
accordance with all of the following:
(i) The governor shall reimburse costs from the fire protection
revolving account created by W.S. 36-2-109;
(ii) If insufficient funds are available in the fire protection
revolving account for reimbursement, the governor may reimburse costs from
the amount appropriated to the governor for public welfare emergencies under
W.S. 9-2-1014.3;
(iii) If insufficient funds are available in the fire protection
revolving account and from the appropriation for public welfare emergencies
under W.S. 9-2-1014.3 for reimbursement, the governor may borrow funds from
the legislative stabilization reserve account in an amount not to exceed
twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00);
(iv) No entity receiving a reimbursement for fire suppression
costs under another provision of law or from another source of funds shall
receive a reimbursement under this section.
(d) Reimbursements under this section shall be made only for the
purposes specified in this section and shall not exceed the actual costs of
suppressing fires as specified in this section.
61 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
[CARRYOVER APPROPRIATIONS]
Section 303.
[WILD HORSE AND BURRO MANAGEMENT]
(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the
governor's office under 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 2,
Section 001 for wild horse and burro management (unit 0128), up to seven
hundred thousand dollars ($700,000.00), or as much thereof as is available,
shall not revert on June 30, 2026 and are hereby reappropriated to the
governor's office for wild horse and burro management on the Wind River
Indian Reservation. Of this general fund reappropriation, any funds expended
for wild horse or burro management on the Wind River Indian Reservation are
conditioned upon matching funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of
appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching
funds from any funds provided by the Eastern Shoshone Tribe, the Northern
Arapaho Tribe or the cooperative tribal governing body.
[DISASTER CONTINGENCY]
(b) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated or reappropriated from the
general fund to the governor's office under 2022 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 51, Section 2, Section 001, as amended by 2023 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 94, Section 2, Section 001 and 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
118, Section 2, Section 001 for disaster contingency, up to one million two
hundred sixty-three thousand nine hundred sixty-six dollars ($1,263,966.00),
or as much thereof as is available, shall not revert on June 30, 2026 and are
hereby reappropriated to the governor's office for disaster contingency.
[STATE CAPITOL - WEEKENDS AND SPECIAL EVENTS]
(c) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the
department of administration and information under 2024 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 118, Section 2, Section 006 in the original amount of three hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($350,000.00), up to two hundred seven thousand
dollars ($207,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, shall not revert
on June 30, 2026 and are hereby reappropriated to the capitol square
preservation account for expenditures subject to W.S. 9-4-225. This
appropriation to the capitol square preservation account is to ensure that
the Wyoming capitol building is open to the public for special events and
during the summer on Saturdays and for extended weekday hours. This
reappropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
62 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
[WYOMING STABLE TOKEN COMMISSION]
(d) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the
Wyoming stable token commission under 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185,
Section 4 and 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 2, Section 091
for operations of the Wyoming stable token commission, up to three million
eight hundred thousand dollars ($3,800,000.00), or as much thereof as is
available, shall not revert on June 30, 2026 and are hereby reappropriated to
the Wyoming stable token commission. The Wyoming stable token commission
shall endeavor to contract with Wyoming domiciled entities when conducting
business funded by the reappropriation to the Wyoming stable token commission
in this section.
[ENHANCED OIL RECOVERY COMMISSION]
(e) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the
enhanced oil recovery commission under 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
118, Section 2, Section 070, up to one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, shall not revert on June
30, 2026 and are hereby reappropriated to the enhanced oil recovery
commission solely for purposes of projects.
[SECTION EFFECTIVE DATE]
(f) This section is effective immediately.
[EMPLOYEE BENEFITS]
Section 304.
(a) The state's contribution to the state employees' and officials'
group insurance plan under W.S. 9-3-210 for each qualifying executive,
judicial and legislative branch employee, including employees of the
University of Wyoming and the community colleges, shall be paid from amounts
appropriated in agency budgets in the following amounts for the specified
time periods:
(i) For the period beginning December 1, 2026 and ending
November 30, 2027, an amount to be determined by the employees' group
insurance section of the department of administration and information but not
to exceed:
(A) One thousand two hundred twenty-one dollars
($1,221.00) per month for an employee electing single coverage;
63 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(B) Two thousand four hundred forty-three dollars
($2,443.00) per month for an employee electing employee plus dependent spouse
coverage;
(C) One thousand eight hundred sixty dollars ($1,860.00)
per month for an employee electing employee plus dependent children coverage;
(D) Two thousand eight hundred dollars ($2,800.00) per
month for an employee electing family coverage;
(E) One thousand four hundred ten dollars ($1,410.00) per
month for employees who elect family coverage when both spouses are employees
of covered entities creating a split family coverage.
(ii) For the period beginning December 1, 2027 and ending
November 30, 2028, an amount to be determined by the employees' group
insurance section of the department of administration and information but not
to exceed:
(A) One thousand three hundred twenty-three dollars
($1,323.00) per month for an employee electing single coverage;
(B) Two thousand six hundred forty-eight dollars
($2,648.00) per month for an employee electing employee plus dependent spouse
coverage;
(C) Two thousand fifteen dollars ($2,015.00) per month for
an employee electing employee plus dependent children coverage;
(D) Three thousand thirty-six dollars ($3,036.00) per
month for an employee electing family coverage;
(E) One thousand five hundred twenty-eight dollars
($1,528.00) per month for employees who elect family coverage when both
spouses are employees of covered entities creating a split family coverage.
(b) There is appropriated two million one hundred eighty-eight
thousand five hundred twenty-four dollars ($2,188,524.00) from the general
fund to the state auditor for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending
June 30, 2028 to be expended only for health insurance benefits for
executive, legislative and judicial branch agency retirees, including
retirees of the University of Wyoming and the community colleges, who
participate in the state employees' and officials' group insurance plan, and
whose date of retirement was prior to July 1, 2008. Payments to the plan on
behalf of eligible retirees shall be made monthly at the rate of eleven
dollars and fifty cents ($11.50) per year of service up to a maximum of
thirty (30) years of service for those retirees who are not Medicare
64 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
eligible, and at the rate of five dollars and seventy-five cents ($5.75) per
year of service up to a maximum of thirty (30) years of service for those
retirees who are Medicare eligible.
(c) Sufficient monies in the retirees prefunded health insurance trust
(fund 561) are appropriated to the state auditor and shall be used for the
purpose of funding the benefits in the same manner and amounts as provided in
subsection (b) of this section for retirees whose effective date of
retirement is July 1, 2008 or later. All investment earnings on the retirees
prefunded health insurance trust (fund 561) shall remain in the fund.
(d) Provided sufficient funds are available, employees whose benefits
are paid from nongeneral fund sources shall receive the same benefits as
provided in this section.
(e) If sufficient funds are not available for obligations under
subsections (b) through (d) of this section, payments to eligible retirees
shall be reduced proportionally.
(f) The appropriations in this section shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.
(g) It is the intent of the legislature that the appropriation in
subsection (b) of this section, adjusted by the number of eligible
participants, shall be included in the state auditor's standard budget for
the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. All state agencies, including the
University of Wyoming, the community colleges and the legislative and
judicial branches, shall include in standard budget requests for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium sufficient amounts to be deposited
into the retiree health insurance benefits account created by 2008 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 48, Section 303. Amounts to include in the standard
budget requests shall be equal to up to one percent (1%) of each benefit
eligible employee's salary for each pay period sufficient to continue
benefits in subsections (c) and (d) of this section for fiscal years 2027 and
2028, as established by the department of administration and information.
[FLEX - EXECUTIVE]
Section 305.
(a) Excluding appropriations to the University of Wyoming and
authorization of University of Wyoming positions and notwithstanding any
provision of W.S. 9-2-1005(a) to the contrary, the governor is authorized to
transfer:
(i) Between programs within any executive branch agency,
excluding the department of environmental quality, department of health and
65 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
department of corrections, ten percent (10%) of the total appropriation for
the agency;
(ii) Between programs within the department of environmental
quality, department of health and department of corrections, one hundred
percent (100%) of the total appropriation for the agency;
(iii) Between executive branch agencies, five percent (5%) of
the total appropriation for the agency from which the funds are transferred;
(iv) Between programs within any executive branch agency, or
between executive branch agencies, legislatively authorized full-time or
part-time positions.
(b) All transfers authorized under this section shall be approved by
the governor and reported to the joint appropriations committee through the
B-11 process as authorized by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported pursuant to
W.S. 9-2-1013(b).
(c) The authority granted under this section is effective for the
period beginning on the effective date of this section and ending June 30,
2028.
(d) Any provision of this act or any other legislation enacted that
specifies that an appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose, or containing language of like effect, or specifying a
position within an agency shall prevail over this section and no such funds
so appropriated or positions so specified shall be subject to subsection (a)
of this section.
[FLEX – JUDICIARY]
Section 306.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the supreme court
may transfer up to five percent (5%) of the total general fund appropriation
between programs within the supreme court. With the approval of the district
court budget committee, up to five percent (5%) of the general fund
appropriation to each district court may be transferred to one (1) or more
other district courts. Authority pursuant to this section includes transfers
of associated legislatively authorized full-time or part-time positions and
shall be effective for the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30,
2028. Any transfers pursuant to this section shall be reported annually by
the supreme court to the joint appropriations committee. The report shall
specify the appropriations and authorized positions transferred including
transfers between expenditure series, programs and courts.
66 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) Any provision of this act or any other legislation enacted that
specifies that an appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose, or containing language of like effect, shall prevail over this
section and no such funds so appropriated or positions so specified shall be
subject to subsection (a) of this section.
[PERSONAL SERVICES TRANSFERS]
Section 307.
(a) Unless otherwise specifically provided, nonfederal fund
appropriations for personal services (100 series) contained in this act shall
not be transferred to any other series or expended for any purpose other than
personal services. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) or any other
provision of this act, nonfederal fund appropriations for contractual
services (900 series) contained in this act shall not be transferred to the
personal services (100 series).
(b) The following appropriations and agencies are exempt from this
section:
(i) Section 2, Section 020 of this act to the department of
environmental quality;
(ii) Section 2, Section 048 of this act to the department of
health;
(iii) Section 2, Section 080 of this act to the department of
corrections;
(iv) Any other appropriation in this act that specifies that the
appropriation shall not be subject to this section.
(c) The judicial branch is exempt from this section for transfers in a
total amount not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000.00).
[ENHANCED OIL RECOVERY COMMISSION - REAPPROPRIATION]
Section 308. 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section 317(a) is
amended to read:
Section 317.
(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and
9-4-207, unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the
general fund to the enhanced oil recovery commission under 2006
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 35, Section 2, Section 070; 2008
67 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 48, Section 2, Section 070; 2010
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 39, Section 2, Section 070; 2012
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 26, Section 2, Section 070 as
amended by 2013 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 73, Section 2,
Section 070; 2014 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 26, Section 2,
Section 070; 2016 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 31, Section 2,
Section 070 as amended by 2017 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 120,
Section 2, Section 070; 2018 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 134,
Section 2, Section 070; 2020 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 80,
Section 2, Section 070 as amended by 2021 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 69, Section 2, Section 070, up to one million nine
hundred six thousand seven hundred eighty-two dollars
($1,906,782.00) or as much thereof as is available that was not
reverted as provided by law shall be deemed reverted for
accounting purposes on June 30, 2022 and is reappropriated to the
enhanced oil recovery commission for purposes of projects only.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, the
reappropriation in this section shall not revert until June 30,
2026 2028. It is the intent of the legislature that this
reappropriation not be included in the enhanced oil recovery
commission's standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.
[DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARRYOVERS]
Section 309.
(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the
department of health under 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 2,
Section 048, up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00) or as much
thereof as is available, shall not revert on June 30, 2026 and are hereby
reappropriated to the department of health for the following purposes:
(i) Unanticipated Medicaid expenditures, including increased
enrollment;
(ii) Costs associated with the implementation of Title 25,
Chapter 10 of the Wyoming statutes;
(iii) State facility staffing needs.
(b) The transfer or expenditure of funds under this section shall be
approved by the governor and reported to the joint appropriations committee
through the B-11 process as authorized by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported
pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1013(b).
68 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) No funds from the reappropriations in this section shall be
expended by the department of health if the expenditure would result in an
increase to maintenance of effort, maintenance of financial support or a
similar federal requirement to expend additional state funds in future budget
periods.
(d) It is the intent of the legislature that the carryover
appropriations in this section not be included in the department of health's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
(e) This section is effective immediately.
[LIMITATION ON SALARY INCREASE]
Section 310.
(a) The 2029-2030 biennial general fund standard budget for personal
services (100 series) for each agency shall be less than or equal to the
2027-2028 biennial appropriations for personal services (100 series) for each
agency in all enacted laws including any calculated amount to continue
legislatively approved compensation increases throughout the 2027-2028
biennium and excluding benefit adjustments and allowable personal services
transfers pursuant to Section 307 of this act and documented through the
report required by W.S. 9-2-1011(c).
(b) Any salary increase for an executive branch state position,
including those of the game and fish department, department of transportation
and boards and commissions and excluding positions of the University of
Wyoming or community colleges, during the 2027-2028 biennium for which the
compensation increase has not been approved by the legislature shall be
reviewed and approved by the governor or his designee.
(c) Any salary increase for a judicial branch position during the
2027-2028 biennium for which the compensation increase has not been approved
by the legislature shall be reviewed and approved by either the district
court judge, chief justice or the board of judicial policy and
administration.
[CONCURRENCE WITH GOVERNOR'S BIENNIAL BUDGET DEVELOPMENT RECOMMENDATIONS]
Section 311.
(a) Unless otherwise provided in this act, it is the intent of the
legislature to concur with the recommendations contained in the governor's
2027-2028 biennial budget for one-time funding, sustained funding or
expenditures anticipated to increase or decrease and be included in the
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
69 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) It is the intent of the legislature that continuation of at-will
employee contract positions not explicitly denied by this act shall continue
as requested throughout the period of July 1, 2026 through June 30, 2028 and
be included in the standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.
(c) Authorization for at-will employee contract positions within the
office of state lands and investments, department of health and department of
workforce services supported by funds originating from section 9901 of the
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2, shall remain effective until
the latter of:
(i) December 31, 2026;
(ii) The date of completion of any federally required reporting
and audits; or
(iii) The date of any extension of federal expenditure deadlines
under section 9901 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2,
enacted into law.
[ENERGY MATCHING FUND GRANT]
Section 312.
(a) Upon favorable recommendation of the Wyoming energy authority and
approval by the governor, the state treasurer shall provide funds for grants
for energy matching projects related to rare earth resources totaling not
more than sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000.00) in the aggregate from the
legislative stabilization reserve account, subject to all of the following:
(i) The Wyoming energy authority shall solicit applications for
grants under this section and reject or recommend approval of applications
for final action by the governor;
(ii) The grants under this section are for purposes of providing
matching funds for private or federal funding for construction or operation
of commercial deployment projects related to the processing or separation of
rare earth resources located in Wyoming;
(iii) Expenditure of funds granted under this section shall be
conditioned upon receipt of matching funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00)
of granted funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from
nonstate sources;
70 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iv) The Wyoming energy authority and the state treasurer shall
recommend other terms and conditions for grants awarded under this section.
The governor shall determine all terms and conditions for grants under this
section;
(v) No grant shall be made without the written opinion of the
attorney general certifying the legality of the transaction and all documents
connected therewith;
(vi) The governor shall approve an applicant's proposed
construction or operation of commercial deployment projects related to the
processing or separation of rare earth resources located in Wyoming only upon
a determination that the proposed construction or operation will result in
substantial benefit to the public.
(b) All proposed grants under this section, including the terms,
conditions and the purposes and goals of each grant shall be reported to the
management council of the legislature and the joint appropriations committee
not less than ten (10) days prior to execution of the grant.
[RESERVED]
Section 313. [Reserved.]
[RESERVED]
Section 314. [Reserved.]
[RESERVED]
Section 315. [Reserved.]
[RESERVED]
Section 316. [Reserved.]
[DEAPPROPRIATION – BUSINESS READY COMMUNITY ACCOUNT]
Section 317.
(a) The Wyoming business council shall revert all unexpended,
unobligated funds held in the business ready community account to the general
fund.
(b) Any amounts reverted to the general fund under this section prior
to June 30, 2026 shall be subtracted from the calculation of the transfer of
funds from the budget reserve account to the legislative stabilization
71 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
reserve account as required by 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118,
Section 300(b).
(c) This section is effective immediately.
[REVISIONS TO PRIOR APPROPRIATIONS]
Section 318.
(a) 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section 321, as amended by
2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, and as further amended by 2024 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 318, by creating a new subsection (g) and
2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section 325, as amended by 2023
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, and as further amended by 2024 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 318, by creating a new subsection (g) are
amended to read:
[ENERGY MATCHING FUNDS]
Section 321.
(g) All proposed expenditures under this section shall be
reported to the management council of the legislature and the
joint appropriations committee with a description of the desired
actions and outcomes not less than ten (10) days before use of
the funds is approved by the governor through the B-11 process as
authorized by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported pursuant to W.S.
9-2-1013(b).
[APPROPRIATION TO MATCH FEDERAL INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS]
Section 325.
(g) All proposed expenditures under this section shall be
reported to the management council of the legislature and the
joint appropriations committee with a description of the desired
actions and outcomes not less than ten (10) days before use of
the funds are approved by the governor through the B-11 process
as authorized by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported pursuant to
W.S. 9-2-1013(b).
(b) This section is effective immediately.
[RESERVED]
Section 319. [Reserved.]
72 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
[OFFICE OF TOURISM PROJECT AND CONTRACTS]
Section 320.
(a) There is appropriated fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000.00)
from the Wyoming tourism reserve and projects account to the Wyoming office
of tourism to contract with a rodeo and cowboy museum and hall of fame
project to promote tourism and preserve Wyoming's cowboy heritage and western
history. This appropriation shall be distributed to the office of tourism in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the office of
tourism's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008 and 9-4-207, any unexpended,
unobligated funds from the appropriation in this section shall not revert
until June 30, 2036.
(b) The appropriation in subsection (b) of this section shall be
distributed to the office of tourism, subject to all of the following:
(i) Three million dollars ($3,000,000.00) shall be effective
immediately and shall be distributed not later than April 15, 2026;
(ii) Two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) is effective and shall
be distributed on July 1, 2026;
(iii) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) is effective and
shall be distributed as soon as funds are available on or after July 1, 2027;
(iv) For the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30,
2028, the appropriation in this subsection shall take priority and be fully
executed in each fiscal year prior to any required transfers from the Wyoming
tourism reserve and projects account to the Wyoming outdoor recreation and
tourism trust fund account pursuant to 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
153, Section 2;
(v) The Wyoming tourism board shall solicit requests for
qualifications under subsection (b) of this section and reject or recommend
approval of request for qualifications for final action by the governor;
(vi) The Wyoming tourism board shall determine and certify the
project efforts have a reasonable expectation of increasing tourism to
Wyoming and generating additional jobs, gross state product, state revenue,
and economic diversification;
(vii) Expenditure of funds contracted for a project under
subsection (b) of this section shall be conditioned upon expenditure of
73 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
matching funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of project funds to not
less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any nonstate source;
(viii) Approval and allocation of any project under this section
shall include a repayment provision if the project cannot be completed by
June 30, 2030;
(ix) No contract shall be made without the written opinion of
the attorney general certifying the legality of the transaction and all
documents connected therewith;
(x) The governor shall approve the project contract only upon a
determination that the project will result in a substantial benefit to the
public.
[COURT SECURITY GRANTS]
Section 321. There is appropriated three million two hundred eighty-
four thousand eight hundred twenty dollars ($3,284,820.00) from the general
fund to the supreme court to be matched by a total of three hundred sixty-
four thousand nine hundred eighty dollars ($364,980.00) of local matching
funds to provide funding for court security improvements. Funds shall only
be expended upon recommendation by the Wyoming court security commission for
direct purchase by the state or grants to counties for security equipment
within courthouses or the construction or modification of facilities
containing a state court. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the standard budget of the judicial branch
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose. Any unawarded, unexpended
or unobligated funds remaining from the appropriation in this section shall
revert as provided by law on June 30, 2028.
[ROCKY MOUNTAIN POWER PROJECT ACCOUNT]
Section 322. In accordance with W.S. 9-4-214(a) and 9-4-217(d), the
state auditor shall continue the rocky mountain power project account created
under 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section 322 and continued under
2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 322. All funds within the
account shall be invested by the state treasurer, and all investment earnings
from the account shall be credited to the account. Any funds deposited to
this account shall be continuously appropriated to the Wyoming wildlife and
natural resource trust account board to provide oversight and distribute
funds in accordance with the United States bureau of land management
stipulations for this funding.
[UNIVERSITY OF WYOMING CAPITAL CONSTRUCTION LOAN]
74 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 323.
(a) 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 187, Section 11(b) is amended
to read:
Section 11.
(b) Before July 1, 2026, the state treasurer and the state
auditor shall utilize advance funds in the form of interfund
loans from the legislative stabilization reserve account for
deposit to the University of Wyoming 2023 capital projects
account as necessary to meet appropriations from that account and
contract obligations of the University of Wyoming incurred for
purposes of this section. No interfund loans authorized under
this section shall be made after completion of the projects
specified in subsection (a) of this section. On and after July
1, 2026, the legislature authorizes the discharge of up to
seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000.00) in outstanding
interfund loans from the legislative stabilization reserve
account under this section.
(b) This section is effective immediately.
[MODIFICATION OF AUTHORIZATION TO EXPEND WYOMING STATE PENITENTIARY CAPITAL
CONSTRUCTION ACCOUNT]
Section 324.
(a) 2025 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 161, Section 7 is amended to
read:
Section 7. On the effective date of this section, the
state auditor shall transfer There is appropriated nine million
dollars ($9,000,000.00) from the Wyoming state penitentiary
capital construction account within the strategic investments and
project account to the department of corrections for purposes
of the department's security system. These funds shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. Any funds in
excess of nine million dollars ($9,000,000.00) transferred to the
department of corrections from the Wyoming state penitentiary
capital construction account within the strategic investments and
project account prior to April 1, 2026 for these purposes shall
be restored by the department of corrections to the Wyoming state
penitentiary capital construction account within the strategic
investments and projects account not later than April 15, 2026.
(b) This section is effective immediately.
75 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
[RESERVED]
Section 325. [Reserved.]
[RESERVED]
Section 326. [Reserved.]
[NATIONAL CHAMPIONSHIP AIR RACES - REPEAL]
Section 327.
(a) 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 2, Section 066 is
amended to read:
Section 066. WYOMING TOURISM BOARD
PROGRAM
Wyoming Tourism Board 1., 2. 41,539,082 S14
2,500,000 S0
23,600 SR 44,062,682
41,562,682
TOTALS 0 0 44,062,682 44,062,682
41,562,682 41,562,682
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0
1. Of this other funds appropriation, two million dollars
($2,000,000.00)S14 is for purposes of planning and providing
grants for initiatives recognizing the two hundred fiftieth
anniversary of the declaration of independence. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the Wyoming tourism board's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
2. Of this other funds appropriation, two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00)S0 is appropriated from the
Wyoming tourism reserve and projects account. In the event any
public Wyoming airport is selected as the site of the national
championship air races, the Wyoming tourism board shall
distribute this appropriation to the public entity operating the
selected airport for purposes of economic development and
community assistance conditioned only upon the public entity's
good-faith effort to secure matching funds in the ratio of one
dollar ($1.00) of appropriated other funds to not less than one
76 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any nonstate sources to the
greatest extent possible. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. It is the intent
of the legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
Wyoming tourism board's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
(b) Funds deappropriated as a result of the appropriations repealed in
subsection (a) of this section shall be credited to the account from which
they were appropriated.
(c) This section is effective immediately.
[GOVERNOR'S BIENNIAL BUDGET DEVELOPMENT RECOMMENDATIONS – RESTORATION]
Section 328.
(a) For the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028,
there is appropriated from the accounts and funds specified in this section
one hundred seventy-two million two hundred twenty-one thousand three hundred
fifty-four dollars ($172,221,354.00) to the state auditor to restore the
governor's biennial budget recommendations to the departments specified in
this section:
DEPARTMENT GF FF OF Total
001 Office of the Governor 1. 5,795,794 20,702 5,816,496
004 State Treasurer 4,882 353,658 SR 358,540
006 Administration and Information 2. 1,305,753 4,517,814 IS
33,276 SR 5,856,843
007 Wyoming Military Department 45,813 45,813
008 Office of the Public Defender 39,355 6,945 SR 46,300
010 Department of Agriculture 368,774 368,774
011 Department of Revenue 321,820 15,589 EF 337,409
014 Miners' Hospital Board 4,930 T2 4,930
015 Attorney General 1,308,447 1,642 2,190 S5
4,380 SR
730 TT 1,317,389
016 Board of Barber Examiners 3,000 SR 3,000
018 Real Estate Commission 7,009 SR 7,009
019 Professional Teaching Standards Board 11,120 SR 11,120
020 Department of Environmental Quality 1,277,083 500,000 SR 1,777,083
021 Department of Audit 47,034 12,117 577,109 SR 636,260
023 Public Service Commission 600,000 SR 600,000
024 State Parks & Cultural Resources 141,190 15,966 SR 157,156
027 State Construction Department 11,054 388,580 S5 399,634
033 Board of Cosmetology 4,840 SR 4,840
037 State Engineer 51,100 51,100
038 Wyoming Gaming Commission 14,709 SR 14,709
039 Wildlife/Natural Resource Trust 3. 9,000,000 2,421 SR 9,002,421
041 Fire Prevention & Elec Safety 21,857 21,857
77 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
042 Geological Survey 48,517 48,517
045 Department of Transportation 161,740 S7 161,740
048 Department of Health 4. 38,836,481 30,094,123 68,930,604
049 Department of Family Services 5. 3,185,487 562,145 3,747,632
051 Livestock Board 15,344 36,622 SR 51,966
052 Board of Medicine 6,185 SR 6,185
053 Department of Workforce Services 114,212 161,326 84,610 EF 360,148
054 Board of Nursing 5,237 SR 5,237
055 Oil and Gas Commission 16,289 SR 16,289
057 Community College Commission 6., 7. 3,019,517 3,019,517
060 State Lands and Investments 475,500 475,500
066 Wyoming Tourism Board 11,310 S14 11,310
067 University of Wyoming 7., 8. 60,933,867 60,933,867
070 Enhanced Oil Recovery Comm. 152,802 152,802
072 Retirement System 735,823 PF 735,823
075 Board of Outfitters and Guides 18,552 SR 18,552
077 Enterprise Technology Services 9. 4,105,392 1,926,261 IS
3,770 S5 6,035,423
080 Department of Corrections 461,930 461,930
096 State Budget Department 12,161 12,161
098 Office of Guardian ad Litem 4,472 1,118 SR 5,590
102 Board of Law Examiners 23,000 SR 23,000
103 Comm. on Judicial Conduct & Ethics 1,259 1,259
151 District Attorney/Jud Dist #1 54,500 54,500
157 District Attorney/Jud Dist #7 17,735 17,735
206 Department of Education 47,450 47,450
220 Environmental Quality Council 36,135 36,135
270 Office of Administrative Hearings 11,799 SR 11,799
131,262,717 30,852,055 10,106,582 172,221,354
1. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred eight thousand one
hundred ninety dollars ($108,190.00) is appropriated for local cybersecurity
grant program matching. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the office of the governor's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
2. Of this general fund appropriation, eighteen thousand two hundred sixty-
two dollars ($18,262.00) is appropriated for stormwater fees in Cheyenne. It
is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be included in
the department of administration and information's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. This appropriation is
effective immediately.
3. Of this general fund appropriation, nine million dollars ($9,000,000.00)
is continuously appropriated from the general fund for deposit into the
Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income account and continuously
appropriated from the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income
account to the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income account
78 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
board to provide grants for preventing the introduction and spread of
invasive plants and grasses with a focus on private and state lands across
Wyoming, wildfire prevention measures, or to Wyoming conservation districts,
weed and pest districts and the game and fish commission for purposes of
restoring grass, hay and other vegetation destroyed by wildfires on private
and state lands, preventing the establishment of nonnative, invasive
terrestrial vegetation on private and state lands affected by wildfires and
replacing and restoring habitats on private and state lands destroyed by
wildfires. This appropriation shall not be subject to the requirements of the
Wyoming Wildlife and Natural Resource Funding Act.
4. Of this general fund appropriation, six hundred seven thousand two
hundred twenty-seven dollars ($607,227.00) is appropriated for public
laboratory services and operations. It is the intent of the legislature that
this appropriation not be included in the department of health's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
5. Of this general fund appropriation, three million one hundred forty-five
thousand dollars ($3,145,000.00) and of this federal funds appropriation,
five hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($555,000.00), is appropriated for
information technology system modernization, licenses and product support.
6. Of this general fund appropriation, three million dollars ($3,000,000.00)
is appropriated for Wyoming public television operations and nineteen
thousand five hundred seventeen dollars ($19,517.00) is appropriated for
expenditures under the technology replacement program.
7. Of this general fund appropriation, no funds shall be expended to pay
student athletes salaries or endorsement compensation for participation in
athletic activities sponsored by a community college or the University of
Wyoming.
8. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, twelve million five hundred
thousand dollars ($12,500,000.00) is appropriated to provide a state match
for funds received by the University of Wyoming or donated funds in
accordance with all of the following:
(i) Ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) is conditioned upon a
match for a permanent endowment under W.S. 21-16-901 through 21-16-904. All
state matching distributions from the challenge account created in W.S.
21-16-903 are appropriated solely to support endowments for priorities
identified and approved by the University of Wyoming board of trustees;
(ii) Two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00)
is conditioned upon a match for purposes of expenditures for the college of
agriculture governor's agriculture initiative.
79 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(b) Distribution of the appropriation specified in subsection (a) of
this footnote is conditioned upon a match of funds in the ratio of one dollar
($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of
matching funds from any nonstate source. This appropriation shall be retained
by the state treasurer for distribution in accordance with W.S. 21-16-904,
regardless of whether the match is for purposes of a permanent endowment
under paragraph (a)(i) of this footnote or for expenditure by the University
of Wyoming under paragraph (a)(ii) of this footnote.
9. Of this other funds appropriation, eight hundred seventy-five thousand
nine hundred twenty-nine dollars ($875,929.00)IS is appropriated for cloud
services.
(b) In addition to the appropriations in subsection (a) of this section,
there is authorized fifteen (15) full-time employee positions to restore the
governor's biennial budget development recommendations to the departments
specified in this subsection:
(i) Three (3) full-time employee positions to the department of
administration and information for facility management;
(ii) Two (2) full-time employee positions to the department of
agriculture for the state fair;
(iii) One (1) full-time employee position to the office of the
attorney general for a federal natural resource policy account attorney;
(iv) Three (3) full-time employee positions to the department of
audit for entry-level bank examiners;
(v) One (1) full-time employee position to the state
construction department for a senior policy and planning analyst;
(vi) Two (2) full-time employee positions to the department of
health for long-term care eligibility workers;
(vii) One (1) full-time employee position to the office of state
lands and investments for a fire business assistant;
(viii) One (1) full-time employee position to the office of
state lands and investments for a public information officer;
(ix) One (1) full-time employee position to the Wyoming
retirement system for an investment analyst.
80 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) The appropriations in subsection (a) of this section shall be
exempt from the limitations on the transfer of funds under Section 305 of
this act in a total amount not to exceed one hundred seventy-two million two
hundred twenty-one thousand three hundred fifty-four dollars
($172,221,354.00).
(d) The appropriations in subsection (a) of this section, and the
full-time employee positions and part-time employee positions authorized in
subsection (b) of this section, are subject to Section 311 of this act.
[EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION]
Section 329.
(a) There is appropriated one hundred eleven million seven hundred
eighty-nine thousand six hundred seventy dollars ($111,789,670.00) from the
general fund to the state auditor for salary adjustments of generally funded
employees whose salary is not prescribed by law for the fiscal period
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028, as specified in this
section. From this appropriation, the state auditor shall distribute the
following amounts:
(i) Sixty-four million one hundred ninety-one thousand one
hundred fifty-three dollars ($64,191,153.00) for distribution among the
executive branch agencies, including statewide elected officials, pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section for employees of the executive branch,
including the Wyoming community college commission but not including any
agency or entity specified in paragraphs (ii) through (ix) of this
subsection;
(ii) Seven hundred forty-eight thousand six hundred forty-two
dollars ($748,642.00) to the Wyoming business council pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section for employees of the Wyoming business council;
(iii) Twenty-one thousand seven hundred eighty-three dollars
($21,783.00) to the commission on judicial conduct and ethics pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section for employees of the commission on judicial
conduct and ethics;
(iv) Forty-eight thousand seven hundred twenty-six dollars
($48,726.00) to the Wyoming energy authority pursuant to subsection (b) of
this section for employees of the Wyoming energy authority;
(v) Twenty-seven million six hundred ninety-nine thousand six
hundred thirty-one dollars ($27,699,631.00) to the University of Wyoming,
pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, for employees of the University
81 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
of Wyoming, the University of Wyoming medical education program and school of
energy resources;
(vi) Three hundred seventy-seven thousand eight hundred seventy-
two dollars ($377,872.00) to the University of Wyoming pursuant to subsection
(b) of this section for employees of the enhanced oil recovery commission;
(vii) Fourteen million five hundred eighty-five thousand three
hundred thirty-seven dollars ($14,585,337.00) to the community college
commission to be allocated among the community colleges in proportion to the
state funded payroll of each college relative to the total state funded
payroll as submitted by the colleges to the state budget department and
further distributed within each college pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section among the community colleges for employees of the community colleges;
(viii) Two hundred eighty-three thousand five hundred ninety-
eight dollars ($283,598.00) to the community college commission, pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, for employees of Wyoming public television;
(ix) Three million eight hundred thirty-two thousand nine
hundred twenty-eight dollars ($3,832,928.00) to the supreme court to be
further distributed pursuant to subsection (b) of this section among the
employees of the supreme court, district courts, circuit courts and related
subdivisions.
(b) Funds appropriated under subsection (a) of this section shall be
distributed to employees of entities specified in paragraphs (a)(i) through
(ix) of this section in accordance with an occupational market analysis.
(c) For state executive and judicial branch employees whose
compensation is paid from nongeneral fund sources, to the extent funds are
available, there is appropriated from those accounts and funds amounts
necessary to provide payment of comparable salary increases and employer paid
benefits as that which is distributed to employees of entities specified in
paragraphs (a)(i) through (ix) of this section and subject to the same
distribution methodology that is applied by the entities specified in
paragraphs (a)(i) through (ix) of this section. For state executive and
judicial branch employees whose compensation is partially funded by general
funds, general funds shall be expended for compensation increases in the same
proportion as the employee's budgeted salary is paid by state general funds.
(d) In accordance with Section 310 of this act, it is the intent of
the legislature that the total appropriation in subsection (a) of this
section to each recipient agency be included as a cumulative total of the sum
of the amounts within each of the recipient agencies' standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
82 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
[OUTDOOR TRAILS – MATCHING FUNDS]
Section 330.
(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 39-15-111(p)(i)(A), there is appropriated
eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000.00)S14 from the Wyoming tourism
account to the department of state parks and cultural resources for purposes
of entering into a contract with a trail organization with demonstrated
professional trail construction experience and capacity to serve as a project
manager and fiscal agent for the construction or operation of one (1) or more
trails, subject to all of the following:
(i) The department of state parks and cultural resources shall
solicit applications for grants under this section and shall approve or deny
the applications;
(ii) The funds expended under this section shall be matched at a
ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated funds to not less than one dollar
($1.00) of nonstate funds;
(iii) This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended
for any other purpose;
(iv) It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
not be included in the department of state parks and cultural resources'
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
[RURAL VETERINARY MEDICINE EDUCATION PROGRAM]
Section 331.
(a) There is appropriated five hundred fifty thousand dollars
($550,000.00) from the general fund to the University of Wyoming to provide
veterinary medicine education and training for the first cohort of five (5)
students under an agreement with Kansas State University, or any other
accredited college of veterinary medicine, subject to the following:
(i) The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming shall
enter into a contract with Kansas State University, or any other accredited
college of veterinary medicine, pursuant to W.S. 21-17-109. The contract
shall focus on veterinary medicine education and training with an emphasis on
rural and large animal veterinary practice;
(ii) The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming shall
obtain an agreement with any student receiving veterinary medicine education
and training under this section as specified in W.S. 21-17-109(d); and
83 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iii) All other provisions of W.S. 21-17-109 shall be satisfied.
(b) This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the University of Wyoming's standard budget in the amount of two
million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,750,000.00) to continue
funding for this cohort and two (2) future cohorts for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.
[WYOMING STATE SHOOTING COMPLEX]
Section 332.
(a) As used in this section, "Wyoming state shooting complex" means a
facility located in Park county, near Cody, that is described in the state
shooting complex development and oversight task force final recommendation
that was submitted to the governor, the joint appropriations committee and
the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim
committee, dated August 8, 2024.
(b) From the unexpended, unobligated balance of the state shooting
complex account appropriated under 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146,
Section 3(a)(ii) and the expenditure of which requires additional action of
the legislature, up to two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, is hereby authorized for
expenditure in accordance with this section.
(c) From the unexpended, unobligated balance of the state shooting
complex account appropriated under 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146,
Section 3(a)(iii) and the expenditure of which requires additional action of
the legislature, up to two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000.00), or as much thereof as is available, is hereby authorized for
expenditure in accordance with this section.
(d) Notwithstanding 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146, Section
3(b), funds authorized for expenditure under this section shall be expended,
without delay and as directed by the Wyoming state shooting complex joint
powers board through the department of state parks and cultural resources,
for costs related to the Wyoming state shooting complex that are described in
and subject to the terms of a memorandum of understanding between the Wyoming
state shooting complex joint powers board and the department of state parks
and cultural resources executed on September 3, 2025.
(e) Funds authorized for expenditure under this section shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008,
9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, the authority to expend funds under this section
84 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
shall remain in effect and not lapse at the end of the fiscal period except
upon further legislative action.
(f) Any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining in the state shooting
complex account from appropriations under 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
146, Section 3(a) and not otherwise authorized for expenditure under this
section shall revert to the accounts from which they were appropriated.
(g) This section is effective immediately.
(h) It is the intent of the legislature that no general funds,
legislative stabilization reserve account funds or strategic investments and
projects account funds be appropriated, expended or obligated for the
construction of the Wyoming state shooting complex in excess of any of those
funds already appropriated, expended or obligated for that purpose.
[1893 YELLOWSTONE FOREST RESERVE SURVEY PARTY TREE]
Section 333. Notwithstanding W.S. 39-15-111(p)(i)(A), thirty thousand
dollars ($30,000.00)S14 is appropriated to the department of state parks and
cultural resources from the Wyoming tourism account for the purpose of
retrieving, developing and curating a display for the 1893 Yellowstone Forest
Reserve Survey Party Tree Inscription from the Shoshone national forest. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. It
is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation shall not be
included in the standard budget of the department of state parks and cultural
resources for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
[WYOMING BUSINESS COUNCIL-FORENSIC AUDIT]
Section 334.
(a) There is appropriated one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)
from the general fund to the department of audit to complete or cause to be
completed a forensic audit of the Wyoming business council. The forensic
audit shall commence and be completed as soon as possible after the effective
date of this section. Upon the completion of the audit, the department shall
publicly disseminate and distribute any findings, recommendations and
outcomes to the joint appropriations committee, the joint minerals, business
and economic development interim committee and the governor. If the audit
cannot be completed by July 1, 2026, the department of audit shall advise the
joint appropriations committee, the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee and the governor not later than May 29, 2026 of
that fact and the reasons the audit cannot be completed by the date
specified. The forensic audit shall include, at a minimum:
85 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(i) A list or accounting of all funds currently held as of the
effective date of this section and a list of funds received and expended by
the Wyoming business council since July 1, 2025;
(ii) A list or accounting of all accounts used to hold funds
appropriated to, held by or expended by the Wyoming business council,
including all accounts associated with the Wyoming business council that are
specified by law, any account created by the Wyoming business council and any
account created by the state auditor or any other state agency or entity on
behalf of the Wyoming business council for the period beginning July 1, 2019
and ending with the effective date of this section;
(iii) A list or accounting of all funds from private sources
donated to or otherwise provided to the Wyoming business council that are
held or maintained by the Wyoming business council as of the effective date
of this section;
(iv) A review of whether the Wyoming business council has
administered, held, expended and distributed funds in accordance with all
applicable laws for the period beginning July 1, 2023 and ending on the
effective of this section;
(v) A review of whether the Wyoming business council has
accounted for, held and expended funds in conformance with generally accepted
accounting principles except for deviations authorized by law.
(b) This section is effective immediately.
[STATE PARKS CONCESSIONAIRES]
Section 335.
(a) Of the other funds appropriation specified in 2021 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 140, Section 3, Section 027, capital construction projects,
footnote 1, not more than three million dollars ($3,000,000.00)SR from the
department of state parks and cultural resources' account within the special
revenue fund or as much thereof as is available is reappropriated for the
purposes of this section.
(b) The department of state parks and cultural resources shall conduct
a full appraisal of the value as of the date of enactment of this section of
the capital investment and ongoing concern of the business, less any value
attributed to the land and location for any concessionaire not selected or
pending to be selected as the winner of a subsequent, long-term contract
awarded pursuant to Chapter 10, Section 1(c)(ii) of the department of state
parks and cultural resources rules.
86 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(c) The department of state parks and cultural resources shall expend
funds up to the lesser of the amount reappropriated in subsection (a) of this
section or the value of appraisal determined in subsection (b) of this
section for purposes of reimbursement of a concessionaire's appraised value
identified in subsection (b) of this section.
(d) No expenditure shall be made under this section without the review
and written approval of the attorney general.
(e) The reappropriation under this section shall not be expended or
transferred for any other purpose.
(f) This section is effective immediately.
[BUDGET BALANCERS – TRANSFERS II]
Section 398.
(a) The state auditor shall transfer one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is necessary, from the legislative
stabilization reserve account to the general fund to ensure the unobligated,
unencumbered fund balance of the general fund on June 30, 2028 is not less
than one hundred ninety-two million seven hundred sixty-five thousand dollars
($192,765,000.00).
(b) The state auditor shall transfer up to three hundred twenty-five
million dollars ($325,000,000.00) from the legislative stabilization reserve
account to the general fund at times and in amounts as the state auditor
determines necessary.
[REPEALED SECTIONS]
Section 399.
(a) 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 187, Section 11(c), 2023
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section 321(e) and 325(d), as amended by
2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 318, and 2024 Wyoming Session
Laws, Chapter 118, Section 334 are repealed.
(b) This section is effective immediately.
87 SF0001

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0001
ENROLLED ACT NO. 27, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
[EFFECTIVE DATE]
Section 400.
(a) As used in this act, "effective immediately" means effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as
provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Any
appropriation contained in this act that is effective immediately shall not
lapse until June 30, 2028, unless otherwise specified.
(b) Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
88 SF0001